Florida, session 2026, HB7027.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 1 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
26
27 Section 1. Section 7.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to
28 read:
29 7.03 Bay County.—The boundary lines of Bay County are as
30 follows: Beginning at the southwest corner of section eighteen
31 in township two, north, range eleven, west; thence west on the
32 section line to the southwest corner of section eighteen in
33 township two, north, range twelve, west; thence south on the
34 range line dividing ranges twelve and thirteen, west, to the
35 Meridian base line; thence west on the base line to the thread
36 of Pine Log Creek in range sixteen, west; thence southwesterly
37 along the thread of said creek into the Choctawhatchee River to
38 the thread of said river; thence southwesterly along the thread
39 of said river to a point where said river intersects the range
40 line dividing ranges seventeen and eighteen, west; thence south
41 on said range line to the Gulf of America; thence in a
42 southeasterly southeastwardly direction following the
43 meanderings of said gulf, including the waters of said gulf
44 within the jurisdiction of the State of Florida, including all
45 islands opposite the shoreline to a point where range line
46 dividing ranges eleven and twelve, west, intersects with said
47 gulf; thence north on said range line to place of beginning.
48 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the preferred form of
49 directional terms used in Florida Statutes.
50 Section 2. Section 7.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to
Page 2 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
51 read:
52 7.05 Brevard County.—The boundary lines of Brevard County
53 are as follows: Beginning in the thread of the St. Johns River
54 where the line dividing townships twenty-one and twenty-two
55 south, intersects said river; thence east on said township line
56 to the range line dividing ranges thirty-three and thirty-four
57 east; thence north on said range line to where the same
58 intersects the line dividing townships nineteen and twenty
59 south; thence east on said township line to the Atlantic Ocean;
60 thence southward along the Atlantic coast, including the waters
61 of the Atlantic Ocean within the jurisdiction of Florida, to the
62 intersection with the centerline of the Sebastian Inlet produced
63 easterly eastwardly, said inlet being in section twenty of
64 township thirty south range thirty-nine east; thence westerly on
65 said centerline and continuing southwesterly along the
66 centerline of the approach channel to said inlet from the Indian
67 River to a point due east of the mouth of the St. Sebastian
68 River; thence due west to the mouth of the St. Sebastian River;
69 thence south along the thread of the St. Sebastian River and the
70 thread of the south fork of the St. Sebastian River to a point
71 where the line dividing townships thirty and thirty-one south
72 intersects the thread of said south fork; thence west on said
73 township line to the line dividing ranges thirty-four and
74 thirty-five east; thence north on said range line to the
75 northeast corner of township twenty-five south, range thirty-
Page 3 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
76 four east and the St. Johns River; thence northerly following
77 the thread of said river to the point of beginning.
78 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the preferred form of
79 directional terms used in Florida Statutes.
80 Section 3. Section 7.16, Florida Statutes, is amended to
81 read:
82 7.16 Duval County.—The boundary lines of Duval County are
83 as follows: Beginning at the mouth of the Nassau River; thence
84 up the thread of the main stream of said river to the run of
85 Thomas Swamp; thence up the run of said swamp to where same
86 would intersect the prolongation of a line drawn from the
87 southwest corner of township one north, of range twenty-five
88 east, to the southwest corner of township two south, of range
89 twenty-three east; thence on said last-mentioned line in a
90 southwesterly direction to where its extension would intersect
91 the range line dividing ranges twenty-two and twenty-three east;
92 thence south on said range line, concurrent with the Baker
93 County line, to the dividing line between townships three and
94 four south; thence east on said township line, concurrent with
95 the north boundary of Clay County, to its intersection with the
96 easterly limited access right-of-way line of U.S. 17, said point
97 being located south 88°33′33″ west 2.37 feet of the southwest
98 corner of Lot 12, Block 11 of Island View Subdivision, according
99 to the plat thereof recorded in Plat Book 6, page 10, Public
100 Records of Duval County, Florida; thence, along the limited
Page 4 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
101 access boundary of State Road 9-A, north 08°45′26″ east 119.74
102 feet; thence north 38°21′40″ east 165.23 feet; thence north
103 49°31′32″ east 101.97 feet, thence north 64°29′41″ east 145.12
104 feet; thence north 83°23′50″ east 290.48 feet to the beginning
105 of a curve concave to the south and having a radius of 22,768.31
106 feet; thence, from a tangent bearing of south 89°51′51″ east,
107 run easterly 1,466.89 feet along said curve through a central
108 angle of 03°41′29″ to the end of said curve; thence south
109 86°10′22″ east 891.45 feet; thence south 86°49′27″ east 228.51
110 feet; thence north 87°54′15″ east 816.30 feet, thence south
111 86°49′27″ east, to the west margin of the main channel of the
112 St. Johns River; thence southerly along the west margin of the
113 main channel of said river, concurrent with the east boundary of
114 Clay County, to a point where a line drawn due west from the
115 mouth of Julington Creek would intersect said western margin of
116 the main channel of the St. Johns River; thence, concurrent with
117 the north boundary of St. Johns County, due east to the mouth of
118 Julington Creek; thence along the thread of said Julington Creek
119 to the south bank of Durbin Creek; thence easterly eastwardly
120 along the south bank of said Durbin Creek to a point where the
121 range line dividing ranges twenty-seven and twenty-eight east
122 intersects said south bank; thence south on said range line to
123 the southwest corner of township four south, range twenty-eight
124 east; thence east on the township line dividing townships four
125 and five south to the southeast corner of township four south,
Page 5 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
126 range twenty-eight east; thence north on twenty-nine east to a
127 point where an extension of the section line between sections
128 eight and seventeen and sections nine and sixteen, township
129 three south, range twenty-nine east, would intersect said
130 section line; thence east on said section line to the Atlantic
131 Ocean; thence northward along the Atlantic coast, including the
132 waters of said ocean within the jurisdiction of the State of
133 Florida, to the point of beginning. Excluding from Duval County
134 the following described parcel of land. Begin at the
135 intersection of the north line of township four south with the
136 easterly right-of-way line of State Road 21, also known as
137 Blanding Boulevard, said east right-of-way line bearing north
138 00°02′42″ west; thence north 52°48′22″ east 2,239.0 feet; thence
139 north 40°33′35″ west 301.54 feet; thence north 24°10′22″ east
140 40.18 feet to an intersection with the southerly limited access
141 right-of-way line of State Road 9-A, also known as Interstate
142 295; thence along the southerly and easterly right-of-way line
143 of said State Road 9-A the following 6 courses; thence south
144 66°10′44″ east 1,883.20 feet to the point of curvature of a
145 curve concave northerly and having a radius of 5,879.578 feet;
146 thence southeasterly 2,592.53 feet along and around said curve
147 through a central angle of 25°15′50″ to the point of tangency of
148 said curve; thence north 88°33′33″ east 3,540.04 feet; thence
149 south 78°13′41″ east 219.09 feet; thence south 61°03′20″ east
150 233.15 feet; thence south 52°38′29″ east 379.68 feet to an
Page 6 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
151 intersection with the northerly line of said township four
152 south; thence departing said right-of-way line, run thence west
153 along said north line of township four south to the point of
154 beginning.
155 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the preferred form of
156 directional terms used in Florida Statutes.
157 Section 4. Section 7.38, Florida Statutes, is amended to
158 read:
159 7.38 Levy County.—The boundary lines of Levy County are as
160 follows: Beginning at the mouth of the most southern outlet of
161 the Big Withlacoochee River, running in an easterly eastwardly
162 direction, including all the islands in the mouth of said river,
163 along the thread of said river to where the range line dividing
164 ranges seventeen and eighteen east intersects said river; thence
165 north on said range line to the township line between townships
166 fourteen and fifteen south; thence east on said township line to
167 the middle line of township fourteen south, range nineteen east;
168 thence north on said middle line to the township line between
169 townships eleven and twelve south; thence west on said township
170 line to the range line between ranges seventeen and eighteen
171 east; thence north on said range line to the northeast corner of
172 section thirteen, township eleven south, range seventeen east;
173 thence west on the north line of said section thirteen and other
174 sections to the range line between ranges sixteen and seventeen
175 east; thence north on said range line to the township line
Page 7 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
176 between townships ten and eleven south; thence west on said
177 township line to the range line between ranges fifteen and
178 sixteen east; thence north on said range line to the northeast
179 corner of section thirty-six, township ten south, range fifteen
180 east; thence west on the north boundary of said section thirty-
181 six to the northwest corner of said section thirty-six, thence
182 north one half mile to the middle line of section twenty-six,
183 township ten south, range fifteen east; thence west on the
184 middle line of said section twenty-six and other sections to the
185 range line between ranges fourteen and fifteen east; thence
186 north to the northeast corner of section twenty-five, township
187 ten south, range fourteen east; thence west on the north line of
188 said section twenty-five and other sections to the thread of the
189 Suwannee River; thence southerly along the thread of the main
190 stream of said river to its mouth; thence south and easterly
191 along the Gulf of America, including all the islands, keys, and
192 the waters of said gulf within the jurisdiction of the State of
193 Florida, to the point of beginning.
194 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the preferred form of
195 directional terms used in Florida Statutes.
196 Section 5. Section 7.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to
197 read:
198 7.42 Marion County.—The boundary lines of Marion County
199 are as follows: Beginning in the thread of the Withlacoochee
200 River, at the range line dividing ranges seventeen and eighteen
Page 8 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
201 east; thence north to the township line dividing townships
202 fourteen and fifteen south; thence east on said township line to
203 the middle of township fourteen south, range nineteen east;
204 thence north to the line dividing townships eleven and twelve
205 south; thence east on said township line to Orange Lake; thence
206 down said lake along its southern margin to Orange Creek; thence
207 northerly and easterly down the thread of said creek to its
208 junction with the Oklawaha River; thence northeasterly down the
209 south side of the Oklawaha River at low-water mark to a point on
210 the south side of the Oklawaha River at low-water mark, where
211 the range line dividing ranges twenty-four and twenty-five east
212 in township eleven south, crosses said river; thence south on
213 said range line to where it intersects the township line
214 dividing townships eleven and twelve south; thence east on said
215 township line to where it intersects the section line dividing
216 sections two and three, in township twelve south, of range
217 twenty-five east; thence south on said section line and other
218 section lines to the southwest corner of section twenty-three of
219 said township twelve south, of range twenty-five east; thence
220 east on the section line dividing sections twenty-three and
221 twenty-six and other section lines to the range line dividing
222 ranges twenty-five and twenty-six east; thence south on said
223 range line to the southwest corner of section seven, township
224 thirteen south, range twenty-six east; thence east on the
225 section line dividing sections seven and eighteen, township
Page 9 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
226 thirteen south, range twenty-six east, and other section lines
227 to the west shore of Lake George; thence southerly southwardly
228 along the shore of Lake George to the mouth of Sulphur Spring;
229 thence along the western bank of Lake George until it arrives at
230 range line dividing ranges twenty-six and twenty-seven east;
231 thence south on said range line to township line dividing
232 townships seventeen and eighteen south; thence due west on the
233 said township line to the thread of the Withlacoochee River;
234 thence northwesterly down the thread of said last mentioned
235 river to the place of beginning.
236 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the preferred form of
237 directional terms used in Florida Statutes.
238 Section 6. Section 7.54, Florida Statutes, is amended to
239 read:
240 7.54 Putnam County.—The boundary lines of Putnam County
241 are as follows: Beginning at a point on the south side of the
242 Oklawaha River at low watermark where the range line dividing
243 ranges twenty-four and twenty-five east, township eleven south,
244 crosses said river; thence south on said range line to where
245 same intersects the township line dividing townships eleven and
246 twelve south; thence east on said township line to where same
247 intersects the section line dividing sections two and three,
248 township twelve south, range twenty-five east; thence south on
249 said section line and other section lines to the southwest
250 corner of section twenty-three of said township twelve south,
Page 10 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
251 range twenty-five east; thence east on the section line dividing
252 sections twenty-three and twenty-six and other sections to the
253 range line dividing ranges twenty-five and twenty-six east;
254 thence south on said range line to the southwest corner of
255 section seven, township thirteen south, range twenty-six east;
256 thence east on the south boundary of said section seven and
257 other sections to the west shore of Lake George; thence
258 southerly southwardly along the shore of Lake George to the
259 mouth of Sulphur Spring; thence to a point on Lake George south
260 of the Spanish Grant, known as the Acosta Grant of land, and on
261 the northern boundary of Volusia County; thence in a direct line
262 and along the northern boundary of Volusia County to the most
263 southern part of Crescent Lake; thence along said northern
264 boundary of Volusia County, following the southeast shore of
265 Crescent Lake, to the mouth of Haw Creek and the boundary of
266 Flagler County; thence westerly and then northerly northwardly
267 along the boundary of Flagler County through the middle of
268 Crescent Lake crossing Bear Island on a line easterly of and
269 parallel to the west line of section nineteen, township twelve
270 south, range twenty-eight east, said line being 10,280 feet
271 easterly, measured at right angles from said west line of
272 section nineteen, which line crosses approximately in the center
273 of Bear Island, then continuing north and westerly through the
274 middle of Crescent Lake, to the range line dividing ranges
275 twenty-seven and twenty-eight east; thence north on said range
Page 11 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
276 line to its intersection with Deep Creek; thence west along the
277 center of Deep Creek to the mouth thereof; thence due west to
278 the west margin of the main channel of the St. Johns River;
279 thence northerly along the west margin of the main channel of
280 said river to the intersection of the south boundary line of
281 township seven south with said river; thence west on said
282 township line to its intersection with the north margin of the
283 Bellamy or federal road leading from St. Augustine to
284 Tallahassee; thence south and westerly along the north margin of
285 said road to the point of intersection with such margin of a
286 northerly extension of the east boundary line of Hillcrest on
287 the Lake, a subdivision, as same appears of record in Plat Book
288 2, page 52, Public Records of Clay County; thence south along
289 the east boundary line of such subdivision to the southeast
290 corner of such subdivision; thence west along the south boundary
291 line of such subdivision to a point intersecting the north
292 margin of the Bellamy Road; thence south and westerly along the
293 north margin of said road to where same intersects the north
294 boundary of section seventeen, township nine south, range
295 twenty-three east; thence west on the section line between
296 sections eight and seventeen, seven and eighteen, township nine
297 south, range twenty-three east, to the southeast corner of said
298 section seven; thence continue west on the section line between
299 sections twelve and thirteen, township nine south, range twenty-
300 two east to Santa Fe Lake; thence in a southeasterly direction
Page 12 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
301 to a point on the range line dividing ranges twenty-two and
302 twenty-three east where said range line is intersected by the
303 Bellamy Road; thence south on said range line to where the same
304 intersects the thread of Orange Creek; thence westerly along the
305 thread of said creek to the intersection of same with the
306 Oklawaha River; thence westerly along the south bank of said
307 river at low watermark to the place of beginning.
308 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the preferred form of
309 directional terms used in Florida Statutes.
310 Section 7. Section 7.58, Florida Statutes, is amended to
311 read:
312 7.58 St. Johns County.—The boundary lines of St. Johns
313 County are as follows: Beginning at a point on the Atlantic
314 coast, at a point where the section line between ten and
315 fifteen, in township three south of range twenty-nine east,
316 intersects the said Atlantic coast; thence west on the said
317 section line to a point where said section line would intersect
318 the range line between ranges twenty-eight and twenty-nine east;
319 thence south on said range line to a point where said range line
320 intersects the township line between townships four and five
321 south; thence west on the township line between townships four
322 and five south, in range twenty-eight east, to a point where
323 said township line intersects the range line between ranges
324 twenty-seven and twenty-eight east; thence north on said range
325 line to where the same intersects Durbin Creek; thence along the
Page 13 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
326 south bank of Durbin Creek to Julington Creek; thence along the
327 thread of Julington Creek to the mouth thereof; thence due west
328 to the west margin of the main channel of the St. Johns River
329 and boundary line of Clay County; thence southerly southwardly
330 along the west margin of the main channel of said river and
331 boundaries of Clay and Putnam Counties to a point due west of
332 the mouth of Deep Creek; thence due east to the mouth of Deep
333 Creek; thence up the center of Deep Creek to the point of
334 intersection of Deep Creek with the range lines between ranges
335 twenty-seven and twenty-eight east; thence south on said range
336 line to a point where the south boundary line of section
337 eighteen, in township ten south, range twenty-eight east,
338 intersects said range line; thence east on said section line to
339 the range line between ranges twenty-nine and thirty east;
340 thence north on said range line to the middle of Pellicer's
341 Creek; thence easterly on an imaginary line down the middle of
342 said creek to the mouth of said creek; thence northeasterly on
343 an imaginary line extending from the mouth of Pellicer's Creek
344 to a point on the extension of township line between townships
345 nine and ten south, range thirty-one east and immediately north
346 of Summer Haven on the Atlantic coast; thence northerly
347 northwardly along said Atlantic coast, including the waters of
348 the Atlantic Ocean within the jurisdiction of the State of
349 Florida, to place of beginning.
350 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the preferred form of
Page 14 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
351 directional terms used in Florida Statutes.
352 Section 8. Section 7.66, Florida Statutes, is amended to
353 read:
354 7.66 Walton County.—The boundary lines of Walton County
355 are as follows: Beginning on the Alabama state line where same
356 is intersected by the line dividing centrally range eighteen
357 west; thence south on the section lines to the line dividing
358 townships two and three north, in range eighteen west; thence
359 east to the Choctawhatchee River; thence down the thread of the
360 Choctawhatchee River to a point where said Choctawhatchee River
361 intersects the range line dividing ranges seventeen and eighteen
362 west; thence south on said range line to the Gulf of America;
363 thence in a westerly westwardly direction following the
364 meanderings of said gulf, including the waters of said gulf
365 within the jurisdiction of the State of Florida, to the range
366 line dividing ranges twenty-one and twenty-two west; thence
367 north on said line to the dividing line between Florida and
368 Alabama; thence easterly along said state line to the place of
369 beginning.
370 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the preferred form of
371 directional terms used in Florida Statutes.
372 Section 9. Subsection (3) of section 82.036, Florida
373 Statutes, is amended to read:
374 82.036 Limited alternative remedy to remove unauthorized
375 persons from residential real property.—
Page 15 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
376 (3) To request the immediate removal of an unlawful
377 occupant of a residential dwelling, the property owner or his or
378 her authorized agent must submit a complaint by presenting a
379 completed and verified Complaint to Remove Persons Unlawfully
380 Occupying Residential Real Property to the sheriff of the county
381 in which the real property is located. The submitted complaint
382 must be in substantially the following form:
383
384 COMPLAINT TO REMOVE PERSONS UNLAWFULLY
385 OCCUPYING RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY
386
387 I, the owner or authorized agent of the owner of the real
388 property located at ...(address of property)... ........,
389 declare under the penalty of perjury that (initial each box):
390 1. .... I am the owner of the real property or the
391 authorized agent of the owner of the real property.
392 2. .... I purchased the property on ...(date of
393 purchase)... .....
394 3. .... The real property is a residential dwelling.
395 4. .... An unauthorized person or persons have unlawfully
396 entered and are remaining or residing unlawfully on the real
397 property.
398 5. .... The real property was not open to members of the
399 public at the time the unauthorized person or persons entered.
400 6. .... I have directed the unauthorized person or persons
Page 16 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
401 to leave the real property, but they have not done so.
402 7. .... The person or persons are not current or former
403 tenants pursuant to any valid lease authorized by the property
404 owner, and any lease that may be produced by an occupant is
405 fraudulent.
406 8. .... The unauthorized person or persons sought to be
407 removed are not an owner or a co-owner of the property and have
408 not been listed on the title to the property unless the person
409 or persons have engaged in title fraud.
410 9. .... The unauthorized person or persons are not
411 immediate family members of the property owner.
412 10. .... There is no litigation related to the real
413 property pending between the property owner and any person
414 sought to be removed.
415 11. .... I understand that a person or persons removed
416 from the property pursuant to this procedure may bring a cause
417 of action against me for any false statements made in this
418 complaint, or for wrongfully using this procedure, and that as a
419 result of such action I may be held liable for actual damages,
420 penalties, costs, and reasonable attorney fees.
421 12. .... I am requesting the sheriff to immediately remove
422 the unauthorized person or persons from the residential
423 property. I authorize the sheriff to enter the property using
424 reasonably necessary force, to search the property, and to
425 remove any unauthorized person or persons.
Page 17 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
426 13. .... A copy of my valid government-issued
427 identification is attached, or I am an agent of the property
428 owner, and documents evidencing my authority to act on the
429 property owner's behalf are attached.
430
431 I HAVE READ EVERY STATEMENT MADE IN THIS PETITION AND EACH
432 STATEMENT IS TRUE AND CORRECT. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS
433 MADE IN THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY,
434 PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 92.525, FLORIDA STATUTES.
435
436 ...(Signature of Property Owner or Agent of Owner)...
437
438 Reviser's note.—Amended conform to general style in forms.
439 Section 10. Paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of section
440 100.371, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
441 100.371 Initiatives; procedure for placement on ballot.—
442 (4)
443 (c) An application for registration must be submitted in
444 the format required by the Secretary of State and must include
445 the following:
446 1. The information required to be on the petition form
447 under s. 101.161, including the ballot summary and title as
448 received by the Secretary of State.
449 2. The applicant's name, permanent address, temporary
450 address, if applicable, date of birth, Florida driver license or
Page 18 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
451 Florida identification card number, and the last four digits of
452 his or her social security number.
453 3. An address in this state at which the applicant will
454 accept service of process related to disputes concerning the
455 petition process.
456 4. A statement that the applicant consents to the
457 jurisdiction of the courts of this state in resolving disputes
458 concerning the petition process.
459 5. Any information required by the Secretary of State to
460 verify the applicant's identity or address.
461 6. Whether the applicant has been convicted of a felony
462 violation and has not had his or her right to vote restored, by
463 including the statement, "I affirm that I am not a convicted
464 felon, or, if I am, my right to vote has been restored," and
465 providing a box for the applicant to check to affirm the
466 statement.
467 7. Whether the applicant is a citizen of the United
468 States, by asking the question, "Are you a citizen of the United
469 States of America?" and providing boxes for the applicant to
470 check whether the applicant is or is not a citizen of the United
471 States.
472 8. Whether the applicant is a Florida resident by asking
473 the question, "Are you a resident of the State of Florida?" and
474 providing boxes for the applicant to check whether the applicant
475 is or is not a resident of the State of Florida.
Page 19 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
476 9. The signature of the applicant under penalty of perjury
477 for false swearing pursuant to s. 104.011, by which the
478 applicant swears or affirms that the information contained in
479 the application is true.
480 Reviser's note.—Amended to remove extraneous punctuation.
481 Section 11. Paragraph (h) of subsection (2) of section
482 112.19, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
483 112.19 Law enforcement, correctional, and correctional
484 probation officers; death benefits.—
485 (2)
486 (h)1. Any employer who employs a full-time law
487 enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation officer
488 who, on or after January 1, 1995, suffers a catastrophic injury,
489 as defined in s. 440.02, Florida Statutes 2002, in the line of
490 duty shall pay the entire premium of the employer's health
491 insurance plan for the injured employee, for the injured
492 employee's spouse, and for each dependent child of the injured
493 employee until the child reaches the age of majority or until
494 the end of the calendar year in which the child reaches the age
495 of 25 if the child continues to be dependent for support, or the
496 child is a full-time or part-time student and is dependent for
497 support. The term "health insurance plan" does not include
498 supplemental benefits that are not part of the basic group
499 health insurance plan. If the injured employee subsequently
500 dies, the employer shall continue to pay the entire health
Page 20 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
501 insurance premium for the surviving spouse until remarried, and
502 for the dependent children, under the conditions outlined in
503 this paragraph. However:
504 a. Health insurance benefits payable from any other source
505 shall reduce benefits payable under this section.
506 b. It is unlawful for a person to willfully and knowingly
507 make, or cause to be made, or to assist, conspire with, or urge
508 another to make, or cause to be made, any false, fraudulent, or
509 misleading oral or written statement to obtain health insurance
510 coverage as provided under this paragraph. A person who violates
511 this sub-subparagraph commits a misdemeanor of the first degree,
512 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
513 c. In addition to any applicable criminal penalty, upon
514 conviction for a violation as described in sub-subparagraph b.,
515 a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation
516 officer or other beneficiary who receives or seeks to receive
517 health insurance benefits under this paragraph shall forfeit the
518 right to receive such health insurance benefits, and shall
519 reimburse the employer for all benefits paid due to the fraud or
520 other prohibited activity. For purposes of this sub-
521 subparagraph, the term "conviction" means a determination of
522 guilt that is the result of a plea or trial, regardless of
523 whether adjudication is withheld.
524 2. In order for the officer, spouse, and dependent
525 children to be eligible for such insurance coverage, the injury
Page 21 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
526 must have occurred while the officer was in the line of duty or
527 engaged in an official training exercise. Except as otherwise
528 provided herein, this paragraph may not be construed to limit
529 health insurance coverage for which the officer, spouse, or
530 dependent children may otherwise be eligible, except that a
531 person who qualifies under this section is not eligible for the
532 health insurance subsidy provided under chapter 121, chapter
533 175, or chapter 185.
534 Reviser's note.—Amended to improve clarity.
535 Section 12. Paragraph (g) of subsection (2) of section
536 112.191, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
537 112.191 Firefighters; death benefits.—
538 (2)
539 (g)1. Any employer who employs a full-time firefighter
540 who, on or after January 1, 1995, suffers a catastrophic injury,
541 as defined in s. 440.02, Florida Statutes 2002, in the line of
542 duty shall pay the entire premium of the employer's health
543 insurance plan for the injured employee, for the injured
544 employee's spouse, and for each dependent child of the injured
545 employee until the child reaches the age of majority or until
546 the end of the calendar year in which the child reaches the age
547 of 25 if the child continues to be dependent for support, or the
548 child is a full-time or part-time student and is dependent for
549 support. The term "health insurance plan" does not include
550 supplemental benefits that are not part of the basic group
Page 22 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
551 health insurance plan. If the injured employee subsequently
552 dies, the employer shall continue to pay the entire health
553 insurance premium for the surviving spouse until remarried, and
554 for the dependent children, under the conditions outlined in
555 this paragraph. However:
556 a. Health insurance benefits payable from any other source
557 shall reduce benefits payable under this section.
558 b. It is unlawful for a person to willfully and knowingly
559 make, or cause to be made, or to assist, conspire with, or urge
560 another to make, or cause to be made, any false, fraudulent, or
561 misleading oral or written statement to obtain health insurance
562 coverage as provided under this paragraph. A person who violates
563 this sub-subparagraph commits a misdemeanor of the first degree,
564 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
565 c. In addition to any applicable criminal penalty, upon
566 conviction for a violation as described in sub-subparagraph b.,
567 a firefighter or other beneficiary who receives or seeks to
568 receive health insurance benefits under this paragraph shall
569 forfeit the right to receive such health insurance benefits, and
570 shall reimburse the employer for all benefits paid due to the
571 fraud or other prohibited activity. For purposes of this sub-
572 subparagraph, the term "conviction" means a determination of
573 guilt that is the result of a plea or trial, regardless of
574 whether adjudication is withheld.
575 2. In order for the firefighter, spouse, and dependent
Page 23 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
576 children to be eligible for such insurance coverage, the injury
577 must have occurred as the result of the firefighter's response
578 to what is reasonably believed to be an emergency involving the
579 protection of life or property or an unlawful act perpetrated by
580 another, or the injury must have occurred during an official
581 training exercise in which the firefighter became totally and
582 permanently disabled. Except as otherwise provided herein, this
583 paragraph may not be construed to limit health insurance
584 coverage for which the firefighter, spouse, or dependent
585 children may otherwise be eligible, except that a person who
586 qualifies for benefits under this section is not eligible for
587 the health insurance subsidy provided under chapter 121, chapter
588 175, or chapter 185.
589
590 Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary,
591 the death benefits provided in paragraphs (b), (c), and (f)
592 shall also be applicable and paid in cases where a firefighter
593 received bodily injury prior to July 1, 1993, and subsequently
594 died on or after July 1, 1993, as a result of such in-line-of-
595 duty injury.
596 Reviser's note.—Amended to improve clarity.
597 Section 13. Subsection (4) of section 112.22, Florida
598 Statutes, is amended to read:
599 112.22 Use of applications from foreign countries of
600 concern prohibited.—
Page 24 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
601 (4)(a) Notwithstanding s. 120.74(4) and (5), the
602 department is authorized, and all conditions are deemed met, to
603 adopt emergency rules pursuant to s. 120.54(4) and to implement
604 paragraph (3)(a). Such rulemaking must occur initially by filing
605 emergency rules within 30 days after July 1, 2023.
606 (b) The department shall adopt rules necessary to
607 administer this section.
608 Reviser's note.—Amended to delete an obsolete provision; rule
609 60GG-2.008, Florida Administrative Code, became effective
610 December 18, 2023.
611 Section 14. Paragraph (e) of subsection (7) of section
612 125.01055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
613 125.01055 Affordable housing.—
614 (7)
615 (e)1. A proposed development authorized under this
616 subsection must be administratively approved without further
617 action by the board of county commissioners or any quasi-
618 judicial or administrative board or reviewing body if the
619 development satisfies the county's land development regulations
620 for multifamily developments in areas zoned for such use and is
621 otherwise consistent with the comprehensive plan, with the
622 exception of provisions establishing allowable densities, floor
623 area ratios, height, and land use. Such land development
624 regulations include, but are not limited to, regulations
625 relating to setbacks and parking requirements. A proposed
Page 25 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
626 development located within one-quarter mile of a military
627 installation identified in s. 163.3175(2) may not be
628 administratively approved. Each county shall maintain on its
629 website a policy containing procedures and expectations for
630 administrative approval pursuant to this subsection. For
631 purposes of this subparagraph, the term "allowable density"
632 means the density prescribed for the property in accordance with
633 this subsection without additional requirements to procure and
634 transfer density units or development units from other
635 properties.
636 2. The county must administratively approve the demolition
637 of an existing structure associated with a proposed development
638 under this subsection, without further action by the board of
639 county commissioners or any quasi-judicial or administrative
640 board or reviewing body, if the proposed demolition otherwise
641 complies with all state and local regulations.
642 3. If the proposed development is on a parcel with a
643 contributing structure or building within a historic district
644 which was listed in the National Register of Historic Places
645 before January 1, 2000, or is on a parcel with a structure or
646 building individually listed in the National Register of
647 Historic Places, the county may administratively require the
648 proposed development to comply with local regulations relating
649 to architectural design, such as facade replication, provided it
650 does not affect height, floor area ratio, or of density of the
Page 26 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
651 proposed development.
652 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
653 conform to context.
654 Section 15. Paragraph (e) of subsection (7) of section
655 166.04151, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
656 166.04151 Affordable housing.—
657 (7)
658 (e)1. A proposed development authorized under this
659 subsection must be administratively approved without further
660 action by the governing body of the municipality or any quasi-
661 judicial or administrative board or reviewing body if the
662 development satisfies the municipality's land development
663 regulations for multifamily developments in areas zoned for such
664 use and is otherwise consistent with the comprehensive plan,
665 with the exception of provisions establishing allowable
666 densities, floor area ratios, height, and land use. Such land
667 development regulations include, but are not limited to,
668 regulations relating to setbacks and parking requirements. A
669 proposed development located within one-quarter mile of a
670 military installation identified in s. 163.3175(2) may not be
671 administratively approved. Each municipality shall maintain on
672 its website a policy containing procedures and expectations for
673 administrative approval pursuant to this subsection. For
674 purposes of this paragraph, the term "allowable density" means
675 the density prescribed for the property in accordance with this
Page 27 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
676 subsection without additional requirements to procure and
677 transfer density units or development units from other
678 properties.
679 2. The municipality must administratively approve the
680 demolition of an existing structure associated with a proposed
681 development under this subsection, without further action by the
682 governing body of the municipality or any quasi-judicial or
683 administrative board or reviewing body, if the proposed
684 demolition otherwise complies with all state and local
685 regulations.
686 3. If the proposed development is on a parcel with a
687 contributing structure or building within a historic district
688 which was listed in the National Register of Historic Places
689 before January 1, 2000, or is on a parcel with a structure or
690 building individually listed in the National Register of
691 Historic Places, the municipality may administratively require
692 the proposed development to comply with local regulations
693 relating to architectural design, such as facade replication,
694 provided it does not affect height, floor area ratio, or of
695 density of the proposed development.
696 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
697 conform to context.
698 Section 16. Paragraph (f) of subsection (4) of section
699 202.34, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
700 202.34 Records required to be kept; power to inspect;
Page 28 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
701 audit procedure.—
702 (4)
703 (f) Once the notification required by paragraph (a) is
704 issued, the department, at any time, may respond to contact
705 initiated by a taxpayer to discuss the audit, and the taxpayer
706 may provide records or other information, electronically or
707 otherwise, to the department. The department may examine, at any
708 time, documentation and other information voluntarily provided
709 by the taxpayer, its representative, or other parties;
710 information already in the department's possession; or publicly
711 available information. Examination by the department of such
712 information does not commence an audit if the review takes place
713 within 60 days after the notice of intent to conduct an audit.
714 The requirement in paragraph (a) does not prohibit the
715 department from making initial contact with the taxpayer to
716 confirm receipt of the notification or to confirm the date that
717 the audit will begin. If the taxpayer has not previously waived
718 the 60-day notice period and believes the department commenced
719 the audit before the 61st day, the taxpayer must object in
720 writing to the department before the issuance of an assessment
721 or the objection is waived. If the objection is not waived and
722 it is determined during a formal or informal protest that the
723 audit was commenced before the 61st day after the issuance of
724 the notice of intent to audit, the tolling period provided for
725 in s. 213.345 shall be considered lifted for the number of days
Page 29 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
726 equal to the difference between the date the audit commenced and
727 the 61st day after the date of the department's notice of intent
728 to audit.
729 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial insertion to
730 improve clarity.
731 Section 17. Paragraph (b) of subsection (20) of section
732 212.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
733 212.08 Sales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and
734 storage tax; specified exemptions.—The sale at retail, the
735 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the
736 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following
737 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this
738 chapter.
739 (20) ANNUAL BACK-TO-SCHOOL SALES TAX HOLIDAY.—
740 (b) The tax exemptions provided in this subsection do not
741 apply to sales within a theme park or entertainment complex as
742 defined in s. 509.013(9), within a public lodging establishment
743 as defined in s. 509.013(4), or within an airport as defined in
744 s. 330.27(3) s. 330.27(2).
745 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct a cross-reference to conform
746 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 330.27 by s. 12, ch.
747 2025-155, Laws of Florida.
748 Section 18. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1), subsections
749 (2) and (3), paragraph (a) of subsection (4), and subsection (5)
750 of section 212.099, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
Page 30 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
751 212.099 Credit for contributions to eligible nonprofit
752 scholarship-funding organizations.—
753 (1) As used in this section, the term:
754 (a) "Eligible business" means a tenant or person actually
755 occupying, using, or entitled to the use of any property from
756 which the rental or license fee is subject to taxation under
757 former s. 212.031.
758 (2) An eligible business shall be granted a credit against
759 the tax imposed under former s. 212.031 and collected from the
760 eligible business by a dealer. The credit shall be in an amount
761 equal to 100 percent of an eligible contribution made to an
762 organization on or before July 1, 2025.
763 (3) A dealer shall take a credit against the tax imposed
764 under former s. 212.031 in an amount equal to the credit taken
765 by the eligible business under subsection (2).
766 (4)(a) An eligible business must apply to the department
767 for an allocation of tax credits under this section. The
768 eligible business must specify in the application the state
769 fiscal year during which the contribution will be made, the
770 organization that will receive the contribution, the planned
771 amount of the contribution, the address of the property from
772 which the rental or license fee is subject to taxation under
773 former s. 212.031, and the federal employer identification
774 number of the dealer who collects the tax imposed under former
775 s. 212.031 from the eligible business and who will reduce
Page 31 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
776 collection of taxes from the eligible business pursuant to this
777 section. The department shall approve allocations of tax credits
778 on a first-come, first-served basis and shall provide to the
779 eligible business a separate approval or denial letter for each
780 dealer for which the eligible business applied for an allocation
781 of tax credits. The department may not approve any allocations
782 of tax credits after July 1, 2025. Within 10 days after
783 approving or denying an application, the department shall
784 provide a copy of its approval or denial letter to the
785 organization specified by the eligible business in the
786 application. An approval letter must include the name and
787 federal employer identification number of the dealer from whom a
788 credit under this section can be taken and the amount of tax
789 credits approved for use with that dealer.
790 (5) Each dealer that receives from an eligible business a
791 copy of the department's approval letter and a certificate of
792 contribution, both of which identify the dealer as the dealer
793 who collects the tax imposed under former s. 212.031 from the
794 eligible business and who will reduce collection of taxes from
795 the eligible business pursuant to this section, shall reduce the
796 tax collected from the eligible business under former s. 212.031
797 by the total amount of contributions indicated in the
798 certificate of contribution. The reduction may not exceed the
799 amount of credit allocation approved by the department and may
800 not exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be collected
Page 32 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
801 from the eligible business by a dealer when a payment is made
802 under the rental or license fee arrangement. However, payments
803 by an eligible business to a dealer may not be reduced before
804 October 1, 2018, or after October 1, 2025.
805 (a) If the total amount of credits an eligible business
806 may take cannot be fully used within any period that a payment
807 is due under the rental or license fee arrangement because of an
808 insufficient amount of tax that the dealer would collect from
809 the eligible business during that period, the unused amount may
810 be carried forward for a period not to exceed 10 years.
811 (b) Notwithstanding any other law, after July 1, 2025, any
812 unused earned credit held by an eligible business may be claimed
813 through a refund. An eligible business must attach a copy of the
814 department's approval letter and the certificate of contribution
815 to its refund application, which must be submitted to the
816 department by December 31, 2026, in order to receive the refund.
817 (c) A tax credit may not be claimed on an amended return.
818 (d) A dealer that claims a tax credit must file returns
819 and pay taxes by electronic means under s. 213.755.
820 (e) An eligible business may not convey, assign, or
821 transfer an approved tax credit or a carryforward tax credit to
822 another entity unless all of the assets of the eligible business
823 are conveyed, assigned, or transferred in the same transaction
824 and the successor business continues the same lease with the
825 dealer.
Page 33 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
826 (f) Within any state fiscal year, an eligible business may
827 rescind all or part of a tax credit approved under this section.
828 The amount rescinded shall become available for that state
829 fiscal year to another eligible business as approved by the
830 department if the business receives notice from the department
831 that the rescindment has been accepted by the department. Any
832 amount rescinded under this subsection shall become available to
833 an eligible business on a first-come, first-served basis based
834 on tax credit applications received after the date the
835 rescindment is accepted by the department.
836 (g) Within 10 days after the rescindment of a tax credit
837 under paragraph (f) is accepted by the department, the
838 department shall notify the eligible nonprofit scholarship-
839 funding organization specified by the eligible business. The
840 department shall also include the eligible nonprofit
841 scholarship-funding organization specified by the eligible
842 business on all letters or correspondence of acknowledgment for
843 tax credits under this section.
844 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the repeal of s. 212.031
845 by s. 37, ch. 2025-208, Laws of Florida.
846 Section 19. Paragraph (f) of subsection (5) of section
847 212.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
848 212.13 Records required to be kept; power to inspect;
849 audit procedure.—
850 (5)
Page 34 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
851 (f) Once the notification required by paragraph (a) is
852 issued, the department, at any time, may respond to contact
853 initiated by a taxpayer to discuss the audit, and the taxpayer
854 may provide records or other information, electronically or
855 otherwise, to the department. The department may examine, at any
856 time, documentation and other information voluntarily provided
857 by the taxpayer, its representative, or other parties;
858 information already in the department's possession; or publicly
859 available information. Examination by the department of such
860 information does not commence an audit if the review takes place
861 within 60 days after the notice of intent to conduct an audit.
862 The requirement in paragraph (a) does not prohibit the
863 department from making initial contact with the taxpayer to
864 confirm receipt of the notification or to confirm the date that
865 the audit will begin. If the taxpayer has not previously waived
866 the 60-day notice period and believes the department commenced
867 the audit before the 61st day, the taxpayer must object in
868 writing to the department before the issuance of an assessment
869 or the objection is waived. If the objection is not waived and
870 it is determined during a formal or informal protest that the
871 audit was commenced before the 61st day after the issuance of
872 the notice of intent to audit, the tolling period provided for
873 in s. 213.345 shall be considered lifted for the number of days
874 equal to the difference between the date the audit commenced and
875 the 61st day after the date of the department's notice of intent
Page 35 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
876 to audit.
877 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial insertion to
878 improve clarity.
879 Section 20. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
880 258.004, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
881 258.004 Duties of division.—
882 (1) The Division of Recreation and Parks of the Department
883 of Environmental Protection shall:
884 (b) Preserve, manage, regulate, and protect all parks and
885 recreational areas held by the state. The Division of Recreation
886 and Parks may provide these services by contract or interagency
887 agreement for any water management district when the governing
888 board of a water management district designates or sets aside
889 any park or recreation area within its boundaries.
890 1. All lands managed pursuant to this chapter must be
891 managed:
892 a. In a manner that will provide the greatest combination
893 of benefits to the public and to the land's natural resources;
894 and
895 b. For conservation-based recreational uses and associated
896 facilities; public access and related amenities, including
897 roads, parking areas, walkways, and visitor centers; Florida
898 heritage and wildlife viewing, including preservation of
899 historical structures and activities such as glass bottom boat
900 tours; and scientific research, including archaeology. Such uses
Page 36 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
901 must be managed in a manner that is compatible with and ensures
902 the conservation of this state's natural resources by minimizing
903 impacts to undisturbed habitat. As used in this sub-
904 subparagraph, the term "conservation-based recreational uses"
905 means public outdoor recreational activities that do not
906 significantly invade, degrade, or displace the natural
907 resources, native habitats, or archaeological or historical
908 sites that are preserved within state parks. These activities
909 include, but are not limited to, fishing, camping, bicycling,
910 hiking, nature study, swimming, boating, canoeing, horseback
911 riding, diving, birding, sailing, and jogging.
912 2. To ensure the protection of state park resources,
913 native habitats, and archaeological and historical sites,
914 sporting facilities, including, but not limited to, golf
915 courses, tennis courts, pickleball courts, ball fields, or other
916 sporting facilities, may not be constructed within the
917 boundaries of state parks. This subparagraph may not be
918 construed to prohibit the continued operation, maintenance, or
919 repair of any such sporting facilities, or other facilities,
920 existing within a state park.
921 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial insertion to
922 improve clarity.
923 Section 21. Paragraph (m) of subsection (2) of section
924 288.062, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
925 288.062 Rural Community Investment Program.—
Page 37 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
926 (2) As used in this section, the term:
927 (m) "Taxpayer" means a person who makes an investor
928 contribution and is a taxpayer as defined in s. 220.03(1)(z) s.
929 220.03(z) or a person with tax liability under s. 624.509.
930 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
931 correct a cross-reference to conform to the correct
932 location of the term "taxpayer."
933 Section 22. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
934 316.193, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
935 316.193 Driving under the influence; penalties.—
936 (3) Any person:
937 (c) Who, by reason of such operation, causes or
938 contributes to causing:
939 1. Damage to the property or person of another commits a
940 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
941 775.082 or s. 775.083.
942 2. Serious bodily injury to another, as defined in s.
943 316.1933, commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as
944 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
945 3. The death of any human being or unborn child commits
946 DUI manslaughter, and commits:
947 a. A felony of the second degree, punishable as provided
948 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
949 b. A felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in
950 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if:
Page 38 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
951 (I) At the time of the crash, the person knew, or should
952 have known, that the crash occurred; and
953 (II) The person failed to give information and render aid
954 as required by s. 316.062.
955 c. A felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in
956 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if the person has a prior
957 conviction under this subparagraph, s. 327.35(3)(a)3.c. s.
958 327.35(3)(c)3., s. 782.071, or s. 782.072.
959
960 For purposes of this subsection, the term "unborn child" has the
961 same meaning as provided in s. 775.021(5). A person who is
962 convicted of DUI manslaughter shall be sentenced to a mandatory
963 minimum term of imprisonment of 4 years.
964 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
965 conform to the redesignation of subunits in s. 327.35(3) by
966 s. 6, ch. 2025-197, Laws of Florida.
967 Section 23. Subsection (4) of section 327.4111, Florida
968 Statutes, is amended to read:
969 327.4111 Long-term anchoring.—
970 (4) A person who engages in long-term anchoring of a
971 vessel within the waters of this state without a valid long-term
972 anchoring permit commits a noncriminal infraction, punishable as
973 provided in is s. 327.73.
974 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial insertion to
975 conform to context.
Page 39 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
976 Section 24. Paragraph (g) of subsection (2) of section
977 330.41, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
978 330.41 Unmanned Aircraft Systems Act.—
979 (2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this act, the term:
980 (g) "Property owner" means the owner or owners of record
981 of real property. The term includes real property held in trust
982 for the benefit of one or more individuals, in which case the
983 individual or individuals may be considered as the property
984 owner or owners, provided that the trustee provides written
985 consent. The term does not include persons renting, using,
986 living in, or otherwise occupying real property.
987 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial insertion to
988 improve clarity.
989 Section 25. Subsection (4) of section 332.136, Florida
990 Statutes, is amended to read:
991 332.136 Sarasota Manatee Airport Authority; airport pilot
992 program.—
993 (4) This section shall stand repealed on June 30, 2028,
994 unless reviewed and saved from repeal appeal through reenactment
995 by the Legislature.
996 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to context.
997 Section 26. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
998 338.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
999 338.26 Alligator Alley toll road.—
1000 (3)(a) Fees generated from tolls shall be deposited in the
Page 40 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1001 State Transportation Trust Fund and shall be used:
1002 1. To reimburse outstanding contractual obligations;
1003 2. To operate and maintain the highway and toll
1004 facilities, including reconstruction and restoration;
1005 3. To pay for those projects that are funded with
1006 Alligator Alley toll revenues and that are contained in the
1007 1993-1994 adopted work program or the 1994-1995 tentative work
1008 program submitted to the Legislature on February 22, 1994; and
1009 4. By interlocal agreement, to reimburse a local
1010 governmental entity for the direct actual costs of operating the
1011 fire station at mile marker 63 on Alligator Alley, which shall
1012 be used by the local governmental entity to provide fire,
1013 rescue, and emergency management services exclusively to the
1014 public on Alligator Alley. The local governmental entity must
1015 contribute 10 percent of the direct actual operating costs.
1016 a. The interlocal agreement effective July 1, 2019,
1017 through no later than June 30, 2027, shall control until such
1018 time that the local governmental entity and the department enter
1019 into a new agreement or agree to extend the existing agreement.
1020 For the 2024-2025 fiscal year, the amount of reimbursement may
1021 not exceed $2 million.
1022 b. By December 31, 2024, and every 5 years thereafter, the
1023 local governmental entity shall provide a maintenance and
1024 operations comprehensive plan to the department. The
1025 comprehensive plan must include a current inventory of assets,
Page 41 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1026 including their projected service life, and area service needs;
1027 the call and response history for emergency services provided in
1028 the preceding 5 years on Alligator Alley, including costs; and
1029 future projections for assets and equipment, including
1030 replacement or purchase needs, and operating costs.
1031 c. The local governmental entity and the department shall
1032 review and adopt the comprehensive plan as part of the
1033 interlocal agreement.
1034 d. In accordance with projected incoming toll revenues for
1035 Alligator Alley, the department shall include the corresponding
1036 funding needs of the comprehensive plan in the department's work
1037 program, and the local governmental entity shall include the
1038 same in its capital comprehensive plan and the appropriate
1039 fiscal year budget.
1040 e. At the end of the term of the interlocal agreement, the
1041 ownership and title of all fire, rescue, and emergency equipment
1042 purchased with state funds and used at the fire station during
1043 the term of the interlocal agreement transfers to the state.
1044 Reviser's note.—Amended to delete obsolete language.
1045 Section 27. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
1046 388.46, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1047 388.46 Florida Coordinating Council on Mosquito Control;
1048 establishment; membership; organization; responsibilities.—
1049 (2) MEMBERSHIP, ORGANIZATION, AND RESPONSIBILITIES.—
1050 (a) Membership.—The Florida Coordinating Council on
Page 42 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1051 Mosquito Control shall be composed of the following
1052 representatives or their authorized designees:
1053 1. The Secretary of Environmental Protection.
1054 2. The State Surgeon General.
1055 3. The executive director of the Fish and Wildlife
1056 Conservation Commission.
1057 4. The state epidemiologist.
1058 5. The Commissioner of Agriculture.
1059 6. The Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement Trust
1060 Fund.
1061 7. Representatives from:
1062 a. The University of Florida, Institute of Food and
1063 Agricultural Sciences, Florida Medical Entomological Research
1064 Laboratory.
1065 b. The United States Environmental Protection Agency.
1066 c. The United States Department of Agriculture, Center for
1067 of Medical, Agricultural, and Veterinary Entomology.
1068 d. The United States Fish and Wildlife Service.
1069 8. Four mosquito control directors to be nominated by the
1070 Florida Mosquito Control Association, two representatives of
1071 Florida environmental groups, and two private citizens who are
1072 property owners whose lands are regularly subject to mosquito
1073 control operations, to be appointed to 4-year terms by the
1074 Commissioner of Agriculture and serve until his or her successor
1075 is appointed.
Page 43 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1076 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
1077 conform to the correct name of the center.
1078 Section 28. Subsection (10) of section 391.026, Florida
1079 Statutes, is amended to read:
1080 391.026 Powers and duties of the department.—The
1081 department shall have the following powers, duties, and
1082 responsibilities:
1083 (10) To serve as the lead agency in administering the
1084 Early Steps Program pursuant to part C of the federal
1085 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act and part II III of
1086 this chapter.
1087 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the redesignation of part
1088 III of chapter 391 as part II by s. 18, ch. 2025-88, Laws
1089 of Florida.
1090 Section 29. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1091 394.4575, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1092 394.4575 Student mental health assistance program
1093 evaluation.—
1094 (1) The Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
1095 Accountability (OPPAGA), in consultation with the Department of
1096 Children and Families, the Department of Education, the Louis de
1097 la Parte Florida Mental Health Institute, and any other
1098 identified relevant stakeholder, must evaluate school district
1099 compliance with ss. 1001.212(11), 1006.041, and 1012.584(4) and
1100 the mental health services and supports provided to students
Page 44 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1101 pursuant to those sections. OPPAGA must:
1102 (b) By December 1, 2026, provide a final review and
1103 evaluation of the mental health assistance programs within the
1104 school districts to the Governor, the President of the Senate,
1105 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The evaluation
1106 must include, but is not limited to:
1107 1. An assessment of school district compliance with the
1108 requirements of ss. 1001.212(11), 1006.041, and 1012.584(4).
1109 2. An assessment of the treatment outcomes, system
1110 capacity, and performance of mental health services provided
1111 pursuant to s. 1006.041(2)(a) and (b).
1112 3. An assessment of the mental health assistance programs'
1113 ongoing level of integration with the coordinated system of care
1114 required under s. 394.4573.
1115 4. Recommendations to enhance treatment outcomes, system
1116 capacity, and performance of school-based the mental health
1117 assistance programs and increase the integration of those
1118 programs into the coordinated system of care.
1119 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial deletion to
1120 improve clarity.
1121 Section 30. Subsection (12) of section 400.126, Florida
1122 Statutes, is amended to read:
1123 400.126 Receivership proceedings.—
1124 (12) Concurrently with the appointment of a receiver, the
1125 agency and the Department of Elderly Affairs shall coordinate an
Page 45 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1126 assessment of each resident in the facility by the Comprehensive
1127 Assessment and Review for Long-Term Care Services Long-Term-Care
1128 (CARES) Program for the purpose of evaluating each resident's
1129 need for the level of care provided in a nursing facility and
1130 the potential for providing such care in alternative settings.
1131 If the CARES assessment determines that a resident could be
1132 cared for in a less restrictive setting or does not meet the
1133 criteria for skilled or intermediate care in a nursing home, the
1134 department and agency shall refer the resident for such care, as
1135 is appropriate for the resident. Residents referred pursuant to
1136 this subsection shall be given primary consideration for
1137 receiving services under the community care for the elderly
1138 program in the same manner as persons classified to receive such
1139 services pursuant to s. 430.205.
1140 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
1141 conform to the correct name of the program.
1142 Section 31. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
1143 400.191, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1144 400.191 Availability, distribution, and posting of reports
1145 and records.—
1146 (2) The agency shall publish the Nursing Home Guide
1147 quarterly in electronic form to assist consumers and their
1148 families in comparing and evaluating nursing home facilities.
1149 (a) The agency shall provide an Internet site which must
1150 include at least the following information either directly or
Page 46 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1151 indirectly through a link to another established site or sites
1152 of the agency's choosing:
1153 1. A section entitled "Have you considered programs that
1154 provide alternatives to nursing home care?" which must be the
1155 first section of the Nursing Home Guide and must prominently
1156 display information about available alternatives to nursing
1157 homes and how to obtain additional information regarding these
1158 alternatives. The Nursing Home Guide must explain that this
1159 state offers alternative programs that allow qualified elderly
1160 persons to stay in their homes instead of being placed in
1161 nursing homes and must encourage interested persons to call the
1162 Comprehensive Assessment and Review and Evaluation for Long-Term
1163 Care Services (CARES) Program to inquire as to whether they
1164 qualify. The Nursing Home Guide must list available home and
1165 community-based programs and must clearly state the services
1166 that are provided, including whether nursing home services are
1167 covered under those programs when necessary.
1168 2. A list by name and address of all nursing home
1169 facilities in this state, including any prior name by which a
1170 facility was known during the previous 24-month period.
1171 3. Whether such nursing home facilities are proprietary or
1172 nonproprietary.
1173 4. The current owner of the facility's license and the
1174 year that that entity became the owner of the license.
1175 5. The name of the owner or owners of each facility and
Page 47 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1176 whether the facility is affiliated with a company or other
1177 organization owning or managing more than one nursing facility
1178 in this state.
1179 6. The total number of beds in each facility and the most
1180 recently available occupancy levels.
1181 7. The number of private and semiprivate rooms in each
1182 facility.
1183 8. The religious affiliation, if any, of each facility.
1184 9. The languages spoken by the administrator and staff of
1185 each facility.
1186 10. Whether or not each facility accepts Medicare or
1187 Medicaid recipients or insurance, health maintenance
1188 organization, United States Department of Veterans Affairs,
1189 CHAMPUS program, or workers' compensation coverage.
1190 11. Recreational and other programs available at each
1191 facility.
1192 12. Special care units or programs offered at each
1193 facility.
1194 13. Whether the facility is a part of a retirement
1195 community that offers other services pursuant to part III of
1196 this chapter or part I or part III of chapter 429.
1197 14. Survey and deficiency information, including all
1198 federal and state recertification, licensure, revisit, and
1199 complaint survey information, for each facility. For
1200 noncertified nursing homes, state survey and deficiency
Page 48 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1201 information, including licensure, revisit, and complaint survey
1202 information, shall be provided.
1203 15. The results of consumer satisfaction surveys conducted
1204 pursuant to s. 400.0225.
1205 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
1206 conform to the correct name of the program.
1207 Section 32. Paragraph (e) of subsection (17) of section
1208 409.910, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1209 409.910 Responsibility for payments on behalf of Medicaid-
1210 eligible persons when other parties are liable.—
1211 (17)
1212 (e) Each party shall bear its own attorney fees and costs
1213 for any administrative proceeding conducted pursuant to
1214 paragraphs (b)-(e) this paragraph.
1215 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution for
1216 a reference to "this paragraph," as referenced in the
1217 amendment by s. 6, ch. 2013-48, Laws of Florida, and which
1218 language became paragraphs (b)-(e) in the compilation of
1219 the text pursuant to redesignation by s. 2, ch. 2013-150,
1220 Laws of Florida. Section 2, ch. 2013-150, referenced
1221 "paragraph (a) or paragraph (b)."
1222 Section 33. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1223 409.979, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1224 409.979 Eligibility.—
1225 (1) PREREQUISITE CRITERIA FOR ELIGIBILITY.—Medicaid
Page 49 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1226 recipients who meet all of the following criteria are eligible
1227 to receive long-term care services and must receive long-term
1228 care services by participating in the long-term care managed
1229 care program. The recipient must be:
1230 (b) Determined by the Comprehensive Assessment and Review
1231 and Evaluation for Long-Term Care Services (CARES) preadmission
1232 screening program to require:
1233 1. Nursing facility care as defined in s. 409.985(3); or
1234 2. Hospital level of care, for individuals diagnosed with
1235 cystic fibrosis.
1236 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
1237 conform to the correct name of the program.
1238 Section 34. Subsections (6), (7), (8), and (15) of section
1239 427.703, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1240 427.703 Definitions.—As used in this part:
1241 (8)(6) "Deafblind" means having both a permanent hearing
1242 impairment and a permanent visual impairment and includes dual
1243 sensory impairment.
1244 (6)(7) "Deaf service center" means a center that serves,
1245 within a defined region, individuals with hearing loss or speech
1246 impairment or who are deafblind, by distributing equipment and
1247 providing services on behalf of the administrator.
1248 (7)(8) "Deaf service center director" means an individual
1249 who serves as the director for a deaf service center and is
1250 responsible for ensuring that individuals with hearing loss or
Page 50 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1251 speech impairment or who are deafblind are qualified to receive
1252 equipment or services in accordance with ss. 427.701-427.708,
1253 based on their impairment by attesting to such impairment as
1254 provided for in the procedures developed by the administrator.
1255 (15) "Regional distribution center director" means an
1256 individual qualified by the administrator who serves as the
1257 director for a regional distribution center and meets the
1258 standards for ensuring that individuals with hearing loss or
1259 speech impairment or who are deafblind are qualified to receive
1260 equipment or services in accordance with ss. 427.701-427.708,
1261 based on their impairment by attesting to such impairment as
1262 provided for in the procedures developed by the administrator.
1263 Reviser's note.—Subsections (6)-(8) are amended to conform to
1264 the alphabetical ordering of definitions in this section.
1265 Subsection (15) is amended to confirm editorial insertions
1266 to conform to language elsewhere in the section.
1267 Section 35. Section 429.55, Florida Statutes, is amended
1268 to read:
1269 429.55 Consumer information.—
1270 (1) CONSUMER INFORMATION WEBSITE.—The Legislature finds
1271 that consumers need additional information on the quality of
1272 care and service in assisted living facilities in order to
1273 select the best facility for themselves or their loved ones.
1274 Therefore, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall
1275 create content that is easily accessible through the home page
Page 51 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1276 of the agency's website either directly or indirectly through
1277 links to one or more other established websites of the agency's
1278 choosing. The website must be searchable by facility name,
1279 license type, city, or zip code. By November 1, 2015, The agency
1280 shall include all content in its possession on the website and
1281 add content when received from facilities. At a minimum, the
1282 content must include:
1283 (a) Information on each licensed assisted living facility,
1284 including, but not limited to:
1285 1. The name and address of the facility.
1286 2. The name of the owner or operator of the facility.
1287 3. The number and type of licensed beds in the facility.
1288 4. The types of licenses held by the facility.
1289 5. The facility's license expiration date and status.
1290 6. The total number of clients that the facility is
1291 licensed to serve and the most recently available occupancy
1292 levels.
1293 7. The number of private and semiprivate rooms offered.
1294 8. The bed-hold policy.
1295 9. The religious affiliation, if any, of the assisted
1296 living facility.
1297 10. The languages spoken by the staff.
1298 11. Availability of nurses.
1299 12. Forms of payment accepted, including, but not limited
1300 to, Medicaid, Medicaid long-term managed care, private
Page 52 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1301 insurance, health maintenance organization, United States
1302 Department of Veterans Affairs, CHAMPUS program, or workers'
1303 compensation coverage.
1304 13. Indication if the licensee is operating under
1305 bankruptcy protection.
1306 14. Recreational and other programs available.
1307 15. Special care units or programs offered.
1308 16. Whether the facility is a part of a retirement
1309 community that offers other services pursuant to this part or
1310 part III of this chapter, part II or part III of chapter 400, or
1311 chapter 651.
1312 17. Links to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program
1313 website and the program's statewide toll-free telephone number.
1314 18. Links to the websites of the providers.
1315 19. Other relevant information that the agency currently
1316 collects.
1317 (b) Survey and violation information for the facility,
1318 including a list of the facility's violations committed during
1319 the previous 60 months, which on July 1, 2015, may include
1320 violations committed on or after July 1, 2010. The list shall be
1321 updated monthly and include for each violation:
1322 1. A summary of the violation, including all licensure,
1323 revisit, and complaint survey information, presented in a manner
1324 understandable by the general public.
1325 2. Any sanctions imposed by final order.
Page 53 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1326 3. The date the corrective action was confirmed by the
1327 agency.
1328 (c) Links to inspection reports that the agency has on
1329 file.
1330 (2) VENOUS THROMBOEMBOLISM (VTE) VTE CONSUMER
1331 INFORMATION.—
1332 (a) The Legislature finds that many pulmonary embolisms
1333 (PEs) PEs are preventable and that information about the
1334 prevalence of the disease could save lives.
1335 (b) The term "pulmonary embolism" or "PE" means a
1336 condition in which part of a the clot located in a deep vein
1337 breaks off and travels to the lungs, possibly causing death.
1338 (c) The term "venous thromboembolism" or "VTE" means deep
1339 vein thrombosis, which is a blood clot located in a deep vein,
1340 usually in the leg or arm. The term can be used to refer to deep
1341 vein thrombosis, pulmonary embolism, or both.
1342 (d) Assisted living facilities must provide a consumer
1343 information pamphlet to residents upon admission. The pamphlet
1344 must contain information about venous thromboembolism, including
1345 risk factors and how residents can recognize the signs and
1346 symptoms of venous thromboembolism.
1347
1348 The agency may adopt rules to administer this section.
1349 Reviser's note.—Subsection (1) is amended to delete obsolete
1350 language. Subsection (2) is amended to improve clarity.
Page 54 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1351 Section 36. Paragraph (h) of subsection (4) of section
1352 445.004, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1353 445.004 CareerSource Florida, Inc., and the state board;
1354 creation; purpose; membership; duties and powers.—
1355 (4)
1356 (h)1. The state board shall appoint a Credentials Review
1357 Committee to identify nondegree credentials and degree
1358 credentials of value for approval by the state board and
1359 inclusion in the Master Credentials List. Such credentials must
1360 include registered apprenticeship programs; industry
1361 certifications, including industry certifications for
1362 agricultural occupations submitted pursuant to s. 570.07(43);
1363 licenses; advanced technical certificates; college credit
1364 certificates; career certificates; applied technology diplomas;
1365 associate degrees; baccalaureate degrees; and graduate degrees.
1366 The Credentials Review Committee must include:
1367 a. The Chancellor of the Division of Public Schools.
1368 b. The Chancellor of the Division of Career and Adult
1369 Education.
1370 c. The Chancellor of the Florida College System.
1371 d. The Chancellor of the State University System.
1372 e. The director of the Office of Reimagining Education and
1373 Career Help, who shall serve as chair of the committee.
1374 f. Four members from local workforce development boards,
1375 with equal representation from urban and rural regions.
Page 55 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1376 g. Two members from nonpublic postsecondary institutions.
1377 h. Two members from industry associations.
1378 i. Two members from Florida-based businesses.
1379 j. Two members from the Department of Commerce.
1380 k. One member from the Department of Agriculture and
1381 Consumer Services.
1382 2. All information pertaining to the Credentials Review
1383 Committee, the process for the approval of credentials of value,
1384 and the Master Credentials List must be made available and be
1385 easily accessible to the public on all relevant state agency
1386 websites.
1387 3. The Credentials Review Committee shall establish a
1388 definition for credentials of value and create a framework of
1389 quality. The framework must align with federally funded
1390 workforce accountability requirements and undergo biennial
1391 review.
1392 4. The criteria to determine value for nondegree
1393 credentials should, at a minimum, require:
1394 a. Evidence that the credential meets labor market demand
1395 as identified by the Labor Market Statistics Center within the
1396 Department of Commerce or the Labor Market Estimating Conference
1397 created in s. 216.136, or meets local demand as identified in
1398 the criteria adopted by the Credentials Review Committee. The
1399 Credentials Review Committee may consider additional evidence to
1400 determine labor market demand for credentials for agricultural
Page 56 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1401 occupations. Evidence to be considered by the Credentials Review
1402 Committee must include employer information on present
1403 credential use or emerging opportunities.
1404 b. Evidence that the competencies mastered upon completion
1405 of the credential are aligned with labor market demand.
1406 c. Evidence of the employment and earnings outcomes for
1407 individuals after obtaining the credential. Earnings outcomes
1408 must provide middle-level to high-level wages with preference
1409 given to credentials generating high-level wages. Credentials
1410 that do not meet the earnings outcomes criteria must be part of
1411 a sequence of credentials that are required for the next level
1412 occupation that does meet the earnings outcomes criteria in
1413 order to be identified as a credential of value. For new
1414 credentials, this criteria may be met with conditional
1415 eligibility until measurable labor market outcomes are obtained.
1416 5. The Credentials Review Committee shall establish the
1417 criteria to determine value for degree programs. This criteria
1418 must include evidence that the program meets statewide or
1419 regional labor market demand as identified by the Labor Market
1420 Statistics Center within the Department of Commerce or the Labor
1421 Market Estimating Conference created in s. 216.136, or meets
1422 local demand as determined by the committee. The Credentials
1423 Review Committee may consider additional evidence to determine
1424 labor market demand for credentials for agricultural
1425 occupations. Such criteria, once available and applicable to
Page 57 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1426 baccalaureate degrees and graduate degrees, must be used to
1427 designate programs of emphasis under s. 1001.706 and to guide
1428 the development of program standards and benchmarks under s.
1429 1004.92.
1430 6. The Credentials Review Committee shall establish a
1431 process for prioritizing nondegree credentials and degree
1432 programs based on critical statewide or regional shortages.
1433 7. The Credentials Review Committee shall establish a
1434 process for:
1435 a. At a minimum, quarterly review and approval of
1436 credential applications. Approved credentials of value shall be
1437 used by the committee to develop the Master Credentials List.
1438 b. Annual review of the Master Credentials List.
1439 c. Phasing out credentials on the Master Credentials List
1440 that no longer meet the framework of quality. Credentials must
1441 remain on the list for at least 1 year after identification for
1442 removal.
1443 d. Designating performance funding eligibility under ss.
1444 1011.80 and 1011.81, based upon the highest available
1445 certification for postsecondary students.
1446 e. Upon approval, the state board shall submit the Master
1447 Credentials List to the State Board of Education. The list must,
1448 at a minimum, identify nondegree credentials and degree programs
1449 determined to be of value for purposes of the CAPE Industry
1450 Certification Funding List adopted under s. 1008.44 ss. 1008.44
Page 58 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1451 and 1011.62(1); if the credential or degree program meets
1452 statewide, regional, or local level demand; the type of
1453 certificate, credential, or degree; and the primary standard
1454 occupation classification code.
1455 f. If an application submitted to the Credentials Review
1456 Committee does not meet the required standards, the Credentials
1457 Review Committee must provide a notice of deficiency to the
1458 applicant and the provider who was identified as the point of
1459 contact provided on the application by the end of the next
1460 quarter after receipt of the application. The notice must
1461 include the basis for denial and the procedure to appeal the
1462 denial.
1463 8. The Credentials Review Committee shall establish a
1464 process for linking Classifications of Instructional Programs
1465 (CIP) to Standard Occupational Classifications (SOC) for all new
1466 credentials of value identified on the Master Credentials List.
1467 The CIP code aligns instructional programs to occupations. A CIP
1468 to SOC link indicates that programs classified in the CIP code
1469 category prepare individuals for jobs classified in the SOC code
1470 category. The state board shall submit approved CIP to SOC
1471 linkages to the State Board of Education with each credential
1472 that is added to the Master Credentials List.
1473 9. The Credentials Review Committee shall identify all
1474 data elements necessary to collect information on credentials by
1475 the Florida Education and Training Placement Program automated
Page 59 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1476 system under s. 1008.39.
1477 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the deletion of references
1478 to the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List in s.
1479 1011.62(1) by s. 17, ch. 2025-203, Laws of Florida.
1480 Section 37. Subsection (3) of section 497.271, Florida
1481 Statutes, is amended to read:
1482 497.271 Standards for construction and significant
1483 alteration or renovation of mausoleums and columbaria.—
1484 (3) The licensing authority shall transmit the rules as
1485 adopted under subsection (2), referred to as the "mausoleum
1486 standards," to the Florida Building Commission, which shall
1487 initiate rulemaking under chapter 120 to consider such mausoleum
1488 standards. If such mausoleum standards are not deemed
1489 acceptable, they must be returned by the Florida Building
1490 Commission to the licensing authority with details of changes
1491 needed to make them acceptable. If such mausoleum standards are
1492 acceptable, the Florida Building Commission must adopt a rule
1493 designating the mausoleum standards as an approved revision to
1494 the State Minimum Building Codes under part IV of chapter 553.
1495 When designated by the Florida Building Commission, such
1496 mausoleum standards shall become a required element of the State
1497 Minimum Building Codes under s. 553.73(2) s. 553.73(2)(a) and
1498 shall be transmitted to each local enforcement agency, as
1499 defined in s. 553.71(5). Such local enforcement agency shall
1500 consider and inspect for compliance with such mausoleum
Page 60 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1501 standards as if they were part of the local building code, but
1502 shall have no continuing duty to inspect after final approval of
1503 the construction pursuant to the local building code. Any
1504 further amendments to the mausoleum standards shall be
1505 accomplished by the same procedure. Such designated mausoleum
1506 standards, as from time to time amended, shall be a part of the
1507 State Minimum Building Codes under s. 553.73 until the adoption
1508 and effective date of a new statewide uniform minimum building
1509 code, which may supersede the mausoleum standards as provided by
1510 the law enacting the new statewide uniform minimum building
1511 code.
1512 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct a scrivener's error in
1513 Engrossed C.S. for C.S. for C.S. for H.B. 683, which became
1514 ch. 2025-140, Laws of Florida; that version deleted an
1515 earlier bill version amendment adding paragraphs to s.
1516 553.72(2) but neglected to correct a cross-reference to
1517 that provision updated in the earlier version.
1518 Section 38. Subsection (2) of section 570.321, Florida
1519 Statutes, is amended to read:
1520 570.321 Plant Industry Trust Fund.—
1521 (2) Funds to be credited to and uses of the trust fund
1522 shall be administered in accordance with ss. 581.031, 581.141,
1523 581.211, 581.212, 586.045, 586.15, and 586.16, 593.114, and
1524 593.117.
1525 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to the repeal of ss. 593.114
Page 61 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1526 and 593.117 by s. 68, ch. 2025-22, Laws of Florida.
1527 Section 39. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
1528 599.012, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1529 599.012 Florida Wine Trust Fund; creation.—
1530 (1) There is established the Florida Wine Trust Fund
1531 within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The
1532 department shall use the moneys deposited in the trust fund
1533 pursuant to subsection (2) to do all the following:
1534 (a) Develop and coordinate the implementation of the State
1535 Wine Viticulture Plan.
1536 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
1537 conform to the renaming of the plan by s. 71, ch. 2025-22,
1538 Laws of Florida.
1539 Section 40. Subsection (4) of section 679.3171, Florida
1540 Statutes, is amended to read:
1541 679.3171 Interests that take priority over or take free of
1542 security interest or agricultural lien.—
1543 (4) Subject to subsections (6)-(8), a licensee of a
1544 general intangible or a buyer, other than a secured party, of
1545 collateral other than electronic money, tangible documents,
1546 goods, instruments, tangible documents, or a certificated
1547 security takes free of a security interest if the licensee or
1548 buyer gives value without knowledge of the security interest and
1549 before it is perfected.
1550 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial deletion to
Page 62 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1551 remove duplicative language.
1552 Section 41. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
1553 679.613, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1554 679.613 Contents and form of notification before
1555 disposition of collateral; general.—Except in a consumer-goods
1556 transaction, the following rules apply:
1557 (3) The contents of a notification providing substantially
1558 the information specified in subsection (1) are sufficient, even
1559 if the notification includes:
1560 (a) Information not specified by that subsection
1561 paragraph; or
1562 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to context.
1563 Section 42. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) and paragraph
1564 (g) of subsection (12) of section 718.111, Florida Statutes, are
1565 amended to read:
1566 718.111 The association.—
1567 (1) CORPORATE ENTITY.—
1568 (d) As required by s. 617.0830, an officer, director, or
1569 agent shall discharge his or her duties in good faith, with the
1570 care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would
1571 exercise under similar circumstances, and in a manner he or she
1572 reasonably believes to be in the interests of the association.
1573 An officer, director, or agent shall be liable for monetary
1574 damages as provided in s. 617.0834 if such officer, director, or
1575 agent breached or failed to perform his or her duties and the
Page 63 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1576 breach of, or failure to perform, his or her duties constitutes
1577 a violation of criminal law as provided in s. 617.0834;
1578 constitutes a transaction from which the officer or director
1579 derived an improper personal benefit, either directly or
1580 indirectly; or constitutes recklessness or an act or omission
1581 that was in bad faith, with malicious purpose, or in a manner
1582 exhibiting wanton and willful disregard of human rights, safety,
1583 or property. Forgery of a ballot envelope or voting certificate
1584 used in a condominium association election is punishable as
1585 provided in s. 831.01, the theft or embezzlement of funds of a
1586 condominium association is punishable as provided in s. 812.014,
1587 and the destruction of or the refusal to allow inspection or
1588 copying of an official record of a condominium association that
1589 is accessible to unit owners within the time periods required by
1590 general law in furtherance of any crime is punishable as
1591 tampering with physical evidence as provided in s. 918.13 or as
1592 obstruction of justice as provided in chapter 843. An officer or
1593 director charged by information or indictment with a crime
1594 referenced in this paragraph must be removed from office, and
1595 the vacancy shall be filled as provided in s. 718.112(2)(d)3. s.
1596 718.112(2)(d)2. until the end of the officer's or director's
1597 period of suspension or the end of his or her term of office,
1598 whichever occurs first. If a criminal charge is pending against
1599 the officer or director, he or she may not be appointed or
1600 elected to a position as an officer or a director of any
Page 64 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1601 association and may not have access to the official records of
1602 any association, except pursuant to a court order. However, if
1603 the charges are resolved without a finding of guilt, the officer
1604 or director must be reinstated for the remainder of his or her
1605 term of office, if any.
1606 (12) OFFICIAL RECORDS.—
1607 (g)1. An association managing a condominium with 25 or
1608 more units which does not contain timeshare units shall post
1609 digital copies of the documents specified in subparagraph 2. on
1610 its website or make such documents available through an
1611 application that can be downloaded on a mobile device. Unless a
1612 shorter period is otherwise required, a document must be made
1613 available on the association's website or made available for
1614 download through an application on a mobile device within 30
1615 days after the association receives or creates an official
1616 record specified in subparagraph 2.
1617 a. The association's website or application must be:
1618 (I) An independent website, application, or web portal
1619 wholly owned and operated by the association; or
1620 (II) A website, application, or web portal operated by a
1621 third-party provider with whom the association owns, leases,
1622 rents, or otherwise obtains the right to operate a web page,
1623 subpage, web portal, collection of subpages or web portals, or
1624 an application which is dedicated to the association's
1625 activities and on which required notices, records, and documents
Page 65 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1626 may be posted or made available by the association.
1627 b. The association's website or application must be
1628 accessible through the Internet and must contain a subpage, web
1629 portal, or other protected electronic location that is
1630 inaccessible to the general public and accessible only to unit
1631 owners and employees of the association.
1632 c. Upon a unit owner's written request, the association
1633 must provide the unit owner with a username and password and
1634 access to the protected sections of the association's website or
1635 application which contain any notices, records, or documents
1636 that must be electronically provided.
1637 2. A current copy of the following documents must be
1638 posted in digital format on the association's website or
1639 application:
1640 a. The recorded declaration of condominium of each
1641 condominium operated by the association and each amendment to
1642 each declaration.
1643 b. The recorded bylaws of the association and each
1644 amendment to the bylaws.
1645 c. The articles of incorporation of the association, or
1646 other documents creating the association, and each amendment to
1647 the articles of incorporation or other documents. The copy
1648 posted pursuant to this sub-subparagraph must be a copy of the
1649 articles of incorporation filed with the Department of State.
1650 d. The rules of the association.
Page 66 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1651 e. The approved minutes of all board of administration
1652 meetings over the preceding 12 months.
1653 f. The video recording or a hyperlink to the video
1654 recording for all meetings of the association, the board of
1655 administration, any committee, and the unit owners which are
1656 conducted by video conference over the preceding 12 months.
1657 g. A list of all executory contracts or documents to which
1658 the association is a party or under which the association or the
1659 unit owners have an obligation or responsibility and, after
1660 bidding for the related materials, equipment, or services has
1661 closed, a list of bids received by the association within the
1662 past year. Summaries of bids for materials, equipment, or
1663 services which exceed $500 must be maintained on the website or
1664 application for 1 year. In lieu of summaries, complete copies of
1665 the bids may be posted.
1666 h. The annual budget required by s. 718.112(2)(f) and any
1667 proposed budget to be considered at the annual meeting.
1668 i. The financial report required by subsection (13) and
1669 any monthly income or expense statement to be considered at a
1670 meeting.
1671 j. The certification of each director required by s.
1672 718.112(2)(d)5.b. s. 718.112(2)(d)4.b.
1673 k. All contracts or transactions between the association
1674 and any director, officer, corporation, firm, or association
1675 that is not an affiliated condominium association or any other
Page 67 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1676 entity in which an association director is also a director or
1677 officer and financially interested.
1678 l. Any contract or document regarding a conflict of
1679 interest or possible conflict of interest as provided in ss.
1680 468.4335, 468.436(2)(b)6., and 718.3027(3).
1681 m. The notice of any unit owner meeting and the agenda for
1682 the meeting, as required by s. 718.112(2)(d)4. s.
1683 718.112(2)(d)3., no later than 14 days before the meeting. The
1684 notice must be posted in plain view on the front page of the
1685 website or application, or on a separate subpage of the website
1686 or application labeled "Notices" which is conspicuously visible
1687 and linked from the front page. The association must also post
1688 on its website or application any document to be considered and
1689 voted on by the owners during the meeting or any document listed
1690 on the agenda at least 7 days before the meeting at which the
1691 document or the information within the document will be
1692 considered.
1693 n. Notice of any board meeting, the agenda, and any other
1694 document required for the meeting as required by s.
1695 718.112(2)(c), which must be posted no later than the date
1696 required for notice under s. 718.112(2)(c).
1697 o. The inspection reports described in ss. 553.899 and
1698 718.301(4)(p) and any other inspection report relating to a
1699 structural or life safety inspection of condominium property.
1700 p. The association's most recent structural integrity
Page 68 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1701 reserve study, if applicable.
1702 q. Copies of all building permits issued for ongoing or
1703 planned construction.
1704 r. A copy of all affidavits required by this chapter.
1705 3. The association shall ensure that the information and
1706 records described in paragraph (c), which are not allowed to be
1707 accessible to unit owners, are not posted on the association's
1708 website or application. If protected information or information
1709 restricted from being accessible to unit owners is included in
1710 documents that are required to be posted on the association's
1711 website or application, the association shall ensure the
1712 information is redacted before posting the documents.
1713 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the association or its agent is
1714 not liable for disclosing information that is protected or
1715 restricted under this paragraph unless such disclosure was made
1716 with a knowing or intentional disregard of the protected or
1717 restricted nature of such information.
1718 4. The failure of the association to post information
1719 required under subparagraph 2. is not in and of itself
1720 sufficient to invalidate any action or decision of the
1721 association's board or its committees.
1722 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct cross-references to conform
1723 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 718.112(2)(d) by s.
1724 8, ch. 2025-175, Laws of Florida.
1725 Section 43. Paragraphs (b) and (d) of subsection (2) of
Page 69 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1726 section 718.112, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1727 718.112 Bylaws.—
1728 (2) REQUIRED PROVISIONS.—The bylaws shall provide for the
1729 following and, if they do not do so, shall be deemed to include
1730 the following:
1731 (b) Quorum; voting requirements; proxies.—
1732 1. Unless a lower number is provided in the bylaws, the
1733 percentage of voting interests required to constitute a quorum
1734 at a meeting of the members is a majority of the voting
1735 interests. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or in the
1736 declaration, articles of incorporation, or bylaws, and except as
1737 provided in subparagraph (d)5. (d)4., decisions shall be made by
1738 a majority of the voting interests represented at a meeting at
1739 which a quorum is present.
1740 2. Except as specifically otherwise provided herein, unit
1741 owners in a residential condominium may not vote by general
1742 proxy, but may vote by limited proxies substantially conforming
1743 to a limited proxy form adopted by the division. A voting
1744 interest or consent right allocated to a unit owned by the
1745 association may not be exercised or considered for any purpose,
1746 whether for a quorum, an election, or otherwise. Limited proxies
1747 and general proxies may be used to establish a quorum. Limited
1748 proxies shall be used for votes taken to waive or reduce
1749 reserves in accordance with subparagraph (f)2.; for votes taken
1750 to waive the financial reporting requirements of s. 718.111(13);
Page 70 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1751 for votes taken to amend the declaration pursuant to s. 718.110;
1752 for votes taken to amend the articles of incorporation or bylaws
1753 pursuant to this section; and for any other matter for which
1754 this chapter requires or permits a vote of the unit owners.
1755 Except as provided in paragraph (d), a proxy, limited or
1756 general, may not be used in the election of board members in a
1757 residential condominium. General proxies may be used for other
1758 matters for which limited proxies are not required, and may be
1759 used in voting for nonsubstantive changes to items for which a
1760 limited proxy is required and given. Notwithstanding this
1761 subparagraph, unit owners may vote in person at unit owner
1762 meetings. This subparagraph does not limit the use of general
1763 proxies or require the use of limited proxies for any agenda
1764 item or election at any meeting of a timeshare condominium
1765 association or a nonresidential condominium association.
1766 3. A proxy given is effective only for the specific
1767 meeting for which originally given and any lawfully adjourned
1768 meetings thereof. A proxy is not valid longer than 90 days after
1769 the date of the first meeting for which it was given. Each proxy
1770 is revocable at any time at the pleasure of the unit owner
1771 executing it.
1772 4. A member of the board of administration or a committee
1773 may submit in writing his or her agreement or disagreement with
1774 any action taken at a meeting that the member did not attend.
1775 This agreement or disagreement may not be used as a vote for or
Page 71 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1776 against the action taken or to create a quorum.
1777 5. A board meeting may be conducted in person or by video
1778 conference. A board or committee member's participation in a
1779 meeting via telephone, real-time videoconferencing, or similar
1780 real-time electronic or video communication counts toward a
1781 quorum, and such member may vote as if physically present. A
1782 speaker must be used so that the conversation of such members
1783 may be heard by the board or committee members attending in
1784 person as well as by any unit owners present at a meeting. The
1785 division shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536 and 120.54
1786 governing the requirements for meetings.
1787 (d) Unit owner meetings.—
1788 1. An annual meeting of the unit owners must be held at
1789 the location provided in the association bylaws and, if the
1790 bylaws are silent as to the location, the meeting must be held
1791 within 15 miles of the condominium property or within the same
1792 county as the condominium property. However, such distance
1793 requirement does not apply to an association governing a
1794 timeshare condominium. If a unit owner meeting is conducted via
1795 video conference, a unit owner may vote electronically in the
1796 manner provided in s. 718.128.
1797 2. Unit owner meetings, including the annual meeting of
1798 the unit owners, may be conducted in person or via video
1799 conference. If the annual meeting of the unit owners is
1800 conducted via video conference, a quorum of the members of the
Page 72 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1801 board of administration must be physically present at the
1802 physical location where unit owners can attend the meeting. The
1803 location must be provided in the association bylaws and, if the
1804 bylaws are silent as to the location, the meeting must be held
1805 within 15 miles of the condominium property or within the same
1806 county as the condominium property. If the unit owner meeting is
1807 conducted via video conference, the video conference must be
1808 recorded and such recording must be maintained as an official
1809 record of the association. The division shall adopt rules
1810 pursuant to ss. 120.536 and 120.54 governing the requirements
1811 for meetings.
1812 3. Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a vacancy on the
1813 board caused by the expiration of a director's term must be
1814 filled by electing a new board member, and the election must be
1815 by secret ballot. An election is not required if the number of
1816 vacancies equals or exceeds the number of candidates. For
1817 purposes of this paragraph, the term "candidate" means an
1818 eligible person who has timely submitted the written notice, as
1819 described in sub-subparagraph 5.a. 4.a., of his or her intention
1820 to become a candidate. Except in a timeshare or nonresidential
1821 condominium, or if the staggered term of a board member does not
1822 expire until a later annual meeting, or if all members' terms
1823 would otherwise expire but there are no candidates, the terms of
1824 all board members expire at the annual meeting, and such members
1825 may stand for reelection unless prohibited by the bylaws. Board
Page 73 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1826 members may serve terms longer than 1 year if permitted by the
1827 bylaws or articles of incorporation. A board member may not
1828 serve more than 8 consecutive years unless approved by an
1829 affirmative vote of unit owners representing two-thirds of all
1830 votes cast in the election or unless there are not enough
1831 eligible candidates to fill the vacancies on the board at the
1832 time of the vacancy. Only board service that occurs on or after
1833 July 1, 2018, may be used when calculating a board member's term
1834 limit. If the number of board members whose terms expire at the
1835 annual meeting equals or exceeds the number of candidates, the
1836 candidates become members of the board effective upon the
1837 adjournment of the annual meeting. Unless the bylaws provide
1838 otherwise, any remaining vacancies shall be filled by the
1839 affirmative vote of the majority of the directors making up the
1840 newly constituted board even if the directors constitute less
1841 than a quorum or there is only one director. In a residential
1842 condominium association of more than 10 units or in a
1843 residential condominium association that does not include
1844 timeshare units or timeshare interests, co-owners of a unit may
1845 not serve as members of the board of directors at the same time
1846 unless they own more than one unit or unless there are not
1847 enough eligible candidates to fill the vacancies on the board at
1848 the time of the vacancy. A unit owner in a residential
1849 condominium desiring to be a candidate for board membership must
1850 comply with sub-subparagraph 5.a. 4.a. and must be eligible to
Page 74 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1851 be a candidate to serve on the board of directors at the time of
1852 the deadline for submitting a notice of intent to run in order
1853 to have his or her name listed as a proper candidate on the
1854 ballot or to serve on the board. A person who has been suspended
1855 or removed by the division under this chapter, or who is
1856 delinquent in the payment of any assessment due to the
1857 association, is not eligible to be a candidate for board
1858 membership and may not be listed on the ballot. For purposes of
1859 this paragraph, a person is delinquent if a payment is not made
1860 by the due date as specifically identified in the declaration of
1861 condominium, bylaws, or articles of incorporation. If a due date
1862 is not specifically identified in the declaration of
1863 condominium, bylaws, or articles of incorporation, the due date
1864 is the first day of the assessment period. A person who has been
1865 convicted of any felony in this state or in a United States
1866 District or Territorial Court, or who has been convicted of any
1867 offense in another jurisdiction which would be considered a
1868 felony if committed in this state, is not eligible for board
1869 membership unless such felon's civil rights have been restored
1870 for at least 5 years as of the date such person seeks election
1871 to the board. The validity of an action by the board is not
1872 affected if it is later determined that a board member is
1873 ineligible for board membership due to having been convicted of
1874 a felony. This subparagraph does not limit the term of a member
1875 of the board of a nonresidential or timeshare condominium.
Page 75 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1876 4. The bylaws must provide the method of calling meetings
1877 of unit owners, including annual meetings. Written notice of an
1878 annual meeting must include an agenda; be mailed, hand
1879 delivered, or electronically transmitted to each unit owner at
1880 least 14 days before the annual meeting; and be posted in a
1881 conspicuous place on the condominium property or association
1882 property at least 14 continuous days before the annual meeting.
1883 Written notice of a meeting other than an annual meeting must
1884 include an agenda; be mailed, hand delivered, or electronically
1885 transmitted to each unit owner; and be posted in a conspicuous
1886 place on the condominium property or association property within
1887 the timeframe specified in the bylaws. If the bylaws do not
1888 specify a timeframe for written notice of a meeting other than
1889 an annual meeting, notice must be provided at least 14
1890 continuous days before the meeting. Upon notice to the unit
1891 owners, the board shall, by duly adopted rule, designate a
1892 specific location on the condominium property or association
1893 property at which all notices of unit owner meetings must be
1894 posted. This requirement does not apply if there is no
1895 condominium property for posting notices. In addition to the
1896 physical posting of meeting notices, the association may, by
1897 reasonable rule, adopt a procedure for conspicuously posting and
1898 repeatedly broadcasting the notice and the agenda on a closed-
1899 circuit cable television system serving the condominium
1900 association. If broadcast notice is provided, the notice and
Page 76 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1901 agenda must be broadcast in a manner and for a sufficient
1902 continuous length of time so as to allow an average reader to
1903 observe the notice and read and comprehend the entire content of
1904 the notice and the agenda. In addition to any of the authorized
1905 means of providing notice of a meeting of the board, the
1906 association may, by rule, adopt a procedure for conspicuously
1907 posting the meeting notice and the agenda on a website serving
1908 the condominium association for at least the minimum period of
1909 time for which a notice of a meeting is also required to be
1910 physically posted on the condominium property. Any rule adopted
1911 shall, in addition to other matters, include a requirement that
1912 the association send an electronic notice in the same manner as
1913 a notice for a meeting of the members, which must include a
1914 hyperlink to the website at which the notice is posted, to unit
1915 owners whose e-mail addresses are included in the association's
1916 official records. Unless a unit owner waives in writing the
1917 right to receive notice of the annual meeting, such notice must
1918 be hand delivered, mailed, or electronically transmitted to each
1919 unit owner. Notice for meetings and notice for all other
1920 purposes must be mailed to each unit owner at the address last
1921 furnished to the association by the unit owner, or hand
1922 delivered to each unit owner. However, if a unit is owned by
1923 more than one person, the association must provide notice to the
1924 address that the developer identifies for that purpose and
1925 thereafter as one or more of the owners of the unit advise the
Page 77 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1926 association in writing, or if no address is given or the owners
1927 of the unit do not agree, to the address provided on the deed of
1928 record. An officer of the association, or the manager or other
1929 person providing notice of the association meeting, must provide
1930 an affidavit or United States Postal Service certificate of
1931 mailing, to be included in the official records of the
1932 association affirming that the notice was mailed or hand
1933 delivered in accordance with this provision.
1934 5. The members of the board of a residential condominium
1935 shall be elected by written ballot or voting machine. Proxies
1936 may not be used in electing the board in general elections or
1937 elections to fill vacancies caused by recall, resignation, or
1938 otherwise, unless otherwise provided in this chapter. This
1939 subparagraph does not apply to an association governing a
1940 timeshare condominium.
1941 a. At least 60 days before a scheduled election, the
1942 association shall mail, deliver, or electronically transmit, by
1943 separate association mailing or included in another association
1944 mailing, delivery, or transmission, including regularly
1945 published newsletters, to each unit owner entitled to a vote, a
1946 first notice of the date of the election. A unit owner or other
1947 eligible person desiring to be a candidate for the board must
1948 give written notice of his or her intent to be a candidate to
1949 the association at least 40 days before a scheduled election.
1950 Together with the written notice and agenda as set forth in
Page 78 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1951 subparagraph 4. 3., the association shall mail, deliver, or
1952 electronically transmit a second notice of the election to all
1953 unit owners entitled to vote, together with a ballot that lists
1954 all candidates not less than 14 days or more than 34 days before
1955 the date of the election. Upon request of a candidate, an
1956 information sheet, no larger than 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches,
1957 which must be furnished by the candidate at least 35 days before
1958 the election, must be included with the mailing, delivery, or
1959 transmission of the ballot, with the costs of mailing, delivery,
1960 or electronic transmission and copying to be borne by the
1961 association. The association is not liable for the contents of
1962 the information sheets prepared by the candidates. In order to
1963 reduce costs, the association may print or duplicate the
1964 information sheets on both sides of the paper. The division
1965 shall by rule establish voting procedures consistent with this
1966 sub-subparagraph, including rules establishing procedures for
1967 giving notice by electronic transmission and rules providing for
1968 the secrecy of ballots. Elections shall be decided by a
1969 plurality of ballots cast. There is no quorum requirement;
1970 however, at least 20 percent of the eligible voters must cast a
1971 ballot in order to have a valid election. A unit owner may not
1972 authorize any other person to vote his or her ballot, and any
1973 ballots improperly cast are invalid. A unit owner who violates
1974 this provision may be fined by the association in accordance
1975 with s. 718.303. A unit owner who needs assistance in casting
Page 79 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
1976 the ballot for the reasons stated in s. 101.051 may obtain such
1977 assistance. The regular election must occur on the date of the
1978 annual meeting. Notwithstanding this sub-subparagraph, an
1979 election is not required unless more candidates file notices of
1980 intent to run or are nominated than board vacancies exist.
1981 b. A director of a board of an association of a
1982 residential condominium shall:
1983 (I) Certify in writing to the secretary of the association
1984 that he or she has read the association's declaration of
1985 condominium, articles of incorporation, bylaws, and current
1986 written policies; that he or she will work to uphold such
1987 documents and policies to the best of his or her ability; and
1988 that he or she will faithfully discharge his or her fiduciary
1989 responsibility to the association's members.
1990 (II) Submit to the secretary of the association a
1991 certificate of having satisfactorily completed the educational
1992 curriculum administered by the division or a division-approved
1993 condominium education provider. The educational curriculum must
1994 be at least 4 hours long and include instruction on milestone
1995 inspections, structural integrity reserve studies, elections,
1996 recordkeeping, financial literacy and transparency, levying of
1997 fines, and notice and meeting requirements.
1998
1999 Each newly elected or appointed director must submit to the
2000 secretary of the association the written certification and
Page 80 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2001 educational certificate within 1 year before being elected or
2002 appointed or 90 days after the date of election or appointment.
2003 A director of an association of a residential condominium who
2004 was elected or appointed before July 1, 2024, must comply with
2005 the written certification and educational certificate
2006 requirements in this sub-subparagraph by June 30, 2025. The
2007 written certification and educational certificate is valid for 7
2008 years after the date of issuance and does not have to be
2009 resubmitted as long as the director serves on the board without
2010 interruption during the 7-year period. A director who is
2011 appointed by the developer may satisfy the educational
2012 certificate requirement in sub-sub-subparagraph (II) for any
2013 subsequent appointment to a board by a developer within 7 years
2014 after the date of issuance of the most recent educational
2015 certificate, including any interruption of service on a board or
2016 appointment to a board in another association within that 7-year
2017 period. One year after submission of the most recent written
2018 certification and educational certificate, and annually
2019 thereafter, a director of an association of a residential
2020 condominium must submit to the secretary of the association a
2021 certificate of having satisfactorily completed at least 1 hour
2022 of continuing education administered by the division, or a
2023 division-approved condominium education provider, relating to
2024 any recent changes to this chapter and the related
2025 administrative rules during the past year. A director of an
Page 81 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2026 association of a residential condominium who fails to timely
2027 file the written certification and educational certificate is
2028 suspended from service on the board until he or she complies
2029 with this sub-subparagraph. The board may temporarily fill the
2030 vacancy during the period of suspension. The secretary shall
2031 cause the association to retain a director's written
2032 certification and educational certificate for inspection by the
2033 members for 7 years after a director's election or the duration
2034 of the director's uninterrupted tenure, whichever is longer.
2035 Failure to have such written certification and educational
2036 certificate on file does not affect the validity of any board
2037 action.
2038 c. Any challenge to the election process must be commenced
2039 within 60 days after the election results are announced.
2040 6. Any approval by unit owners called for by this chapter
2041 or the applicable declaration or bylaws, including, but not
2042 limited to, the approval requirement in s. 718.111(8), must be
2043 made at a duly noticed meeting of unit owners and is subject to
2044 all requirements of this chapter or the applicable condominium
2045 documents relating to unit owner decisionmaking, except that
2046 unit owners may take action by written agreement, without
2047 meetings, on matters for which action by written agreement
2048 without meetings is expressly allowed by the applicable bylaws
2049 or declaration or any law that provides for such action.
2050 7. Unit owners may waive notice of specific meetings if
Page 82 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2051 allowed by the applicable bylaws or declaration or any law.
2052 Notice of meetings of the board of administration; unit owner
2053 meetings, except unit owner meetings called to recall board
2054 members under paragraph (l); and committee meetings may be given
2055 by electronic transmission to unit owners who consent to receive
2056 notice by electronic transmission. A unit owner who consents to
2057 receiving notices by electronic transmission is solely
2058 responsible for removing or bypassing filters that block receipt
2059 of mass e-mails sent to members on behalf of the association in
2060 the course of giving electronic notices.
2061 8. Unit owners have the right to participate in meetings
2062 of unit owners with reference to all designated agenda items.
2063 However, the association may adopt reasonable rules governing
2064 the frequency, duration, and manner of unit owner participation.
2065 9. A unit owner may tape record or videotape a meeting of
2066 the unit owners subject to reasonable rules adopted by the
2067 division.
2068 10. Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, any vacancy
2069 occurring on the board before the expiration of a term may be
2070 filled by the affirmative vote of the majority of the remaining
2071 directors, even if the remaining directors constitute less than
2072 a quorum, or by the sole remaining director. In the alternative,
2073 a board may hold an election to fill the vacancy, in which case
2074 the election procedures must conform to sub-subparagraph 5.a.
2075 4.a. unless the association governs 10 units or fewer and has
Page 83 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2076 opted out of the statutory election process, in which case the
2077 bylaws of the association control. Unless otherwise provided in
2078 the bylaws, a board member appointed or elected under this
2079 section shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the
2080 seat being filled. Filling vacancies created by recall is
2081 governed by paragraph (l) and rules adopted by the division.
2082 11. This chapter does not limit the use of general or
2083 limited proxies, require the use of general or limited proxies,
2084 or require the use of a written ballot or voting machine for any
2085 agenda item or election at any meeting of a timeshare
2086 condominium association or nonresidential condominium
2087 association.
2088
2089 Notwithstanding subparagraph (b)2. and sub-subparagraph 5.a.
2090 4.a., an association of 10 or fewer units may, by affirmative
2091 vote of a majority of the total voting interests, provide for
2092 different voting and election procedures in its bylaws, which
2093 may be by a proxy specifically delineating the different voting
2094 and election procedures. The different voting and election
2095 procedures may provide for elections to be conducted by limited
2096 or general proxy.
2097 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct cross-references to conform
2098 to the redesignation of subunits in paragraph (2)(d) by s.
2099 8, ch. 2025-175, Laws of Florida.
2100 Section 44. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
Page 84 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2101 718.501, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2102 718.501 Authority, responsibility, and duties of Division
2103 of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes.—
2104 (2)
2105 (c) On the certification form provided by the division,
2106 the directors of the association shall certify that each
2107 director of the association has completed the written
2108 certification and educational certificate requirements in s.
2109 718.112(2)(d)5.b. s. 718.112(2)(d)4.b. This certification
2110 requirement does not apply to the directors of an association
2111 governing a timeshare condominium.
2112 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct a cross-reference to conform
2113 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 718.112(2)(d) by s.
2114 8, ch. 2025-175, Laws of Florida.
2115 Section 45. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) and paragraph
2116 (e) of subsection (2) of section 718.503, Florida Statutes, are
2117 amended to read:
2118 718.503 Developer disclosure prior to sale; nondeveloper
2119 unit owner disclosure prior to sale; voidability.—
2120 (1) DEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.—
2121 (d) Milestone inspection, turnover inspection report, or
2122 structural integrity reserve study.—If the association is
2123 required to have completed a milestone inspection as described
2124 in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover
2125 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural
Page 85 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2126 integrity reserve study, and the association has not completed
2127 the milestone inspection, the turnover inspection report, or the
2128 structural integrity reserve study, each contract entered into
2129 after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit
2130 shall contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that
2131 the association is required to have a milestone inspection, a
2132 turnover inspection report, or a structural integrity reserve
2133 study and has not completed such inspection, report, or study,
2134 as appropriate. If the association is not required to have a
2135 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899 or a structural
2136 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after
2137 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall
2138 contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that the
2139 association is not required to have a milestone inspection or a
2140 structural integrity reserve study, as appropriate. If the
2141 association has completed a milestone inspection as described in
2142 s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover
2143 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural
2144 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after
2145 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall
2146 contain in conspicuous type:
2147 1. A clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
2148 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
2149 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
2150 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
Page 86 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2151 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
2152 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
2153 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
2154 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND
2155 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 15
2156 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE
2157 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and
2158 2. A clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY
2159 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S INTENTION TO
2160 CANCEL WITHIN 15 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL
2161 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE
2162 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
2163 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
2164 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
2165 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
2166 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
2167 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
2168 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND
2169 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED
2170 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER
2171 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 15
2172 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER
2173 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED
2174 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN
2175 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER
Page 87 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2176 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 718.301(4)(p) AND (q),
2177 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT
2178 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
2179 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF
2180 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL
2181 TERMINATE AT CLOSING.
2182
2183 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this
2184 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before
2185 closing.
2186 (2) NONDEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.—
2187 (e) If the association is required to have completed a
2188 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover
2189 inspection report for a turnover inspection performed on or
2190 after July 1, 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, and
2191 the association has not completed the milestone inspection, the
2192 turnover inspection report, or the structural integrity reserve
2193 study, each contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for
2194 the sale of a residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type
2195 a statement indicating that the association is required to have
2196 a milestone inspection, a turnover inspection report, or a
2197 structural integrity reserve study and has not completed such
2198 inspection, report, or study, as appropriate. If the association
2199 is not required to have a milestone inspection as described in
2200 s. 553.899 or a structural integrity reserve study, each
Page 88 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2201 contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a
2202 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type a statement
2203 indicating that the association is not required to have a
2204 milestone inspection or a structural integrity reserve study, as
2205 appropriate. If the association has completed a milestone
2206 inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection
2207 report for a turnover inspection performed on or after July 1,
2208 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, each contract
2209 entered into after December 31, 2024, for the resale of a
2210 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type:
2211 1. A clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
2212 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
2213 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
2214 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
2215 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
2216 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
2217 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
2218 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND
2219 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 7
2220 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE
2221 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and
2222 2. A clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY
2223 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S INTENTION TO
2224 CANCEL WITHIN 7 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL
2225 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE
Page 89 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2226 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
2227 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
2228 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
2229 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
2230 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
2231 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
2232 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND
2233 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED
2234 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER
2235 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 7
2236 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER
2237 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED
2238 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN
2239 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER
2240 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 718.301(4)(p) AND (q),
2241 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT
2242 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
2243 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF
2244 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL
2245 TERMINATE AT CLOSING.
2246
2247 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this
2248 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before
2249 closing.
2250 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct a cross-reference to conform
Page 90 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2251 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 718.103 by s. 5, ch.
2252 2024-244, Laws of Florida.
2253 Section 46. Paragraph (j) of subsection (1) of section
2254 719.106, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2255 719.106 Bylaws; cooperative ownership.—
2256 (1) MANDATORY PROVISIONS.—The bylaws or other cooperative
2257 documents shall provide for the following, and if they do not,
2258 they shall be deemed to include the following:
2259 (j) Annual budget.—
2260 1. The proposed annual budget of common expenses must be
2261 detailed and must show the amounts budgeted by accounts and
2262 expense classifications, including, if applicable, but not
2263 limited to, those expenses listed in s. 719.504(20). The board
2264 of administration shall adopt the annual budget at least 14 days
2265 before the start of the association's fiscal year. In the event
2266 that the board fails to timely adopt the annual budget a second
2267 time, it is deemed a minor violation and the prior year's budget
2268 shall continue in effect until a new budget is adopted.
2269 2.a. In addition to annual operating expenses, the budget
2270 must include reserve accounts for capital expenditures and
2271 deferred maintenance. These accounts must include, but not be
2272 limited to, roof replacement, building painting, and pavement
2273 resurfacing, regardless of the amount of deferred maintenance
2274 expense or replacement cost, and for any other items for which
2275 the deferred maintenance expense or replacement cost exceeds
Page 91 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2276 $25,000 or the inflation-adjusted amount determined by the
2277 division under subparagraph 6., whichever amount is greater. The
2278 amount to be reserved must be computed by means of a formula
2279 which is based upon estimated remaining useful life and
2280 estimated replacement cost or deferred maintenance expense of
2281 the reserve item. In a budget adopted by an association that is
2282 required to obtain a structural integrity reserve study,
2283 reserves must be maintained for the items identified in
2284 paragraph (k) for which the association is responsible pursuant
2285 to the declaration, and the reserve amount for such items must
2286 be based on the findings and recommendations of the
2287 association's most recent structural integrity reserve study.
2288 With respect to items for which an estimate of useful life is
2289 not readily ascertainable or with an estimated remaining useful
2290 life of greater than 25 years, an association is not required to
2291 reserve replacement costs for such items, but an association
2292 must reserve the amount of deferred maintenance expense, if any,
2293 which is recommended by the structural integrity reserve study
2294 for such items. The association may adjust replacement reserve
2295 assessments annually to take into account an inflation
2296 adjustment and any changes in estimates or extension of the
2297 useful life of a reserve item caused by deferred maintenance.
2298 b. The members of a unit-owner-controlled association may
2299 determine, by a majority vote of the total voting interests of
2300 the association, for a fiscal year to provide no reserves or
Page 92 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2301 reserves less adequate than required by this subsection. Before
2302 turnover of control of an association by a developer to unit
2303 owners other than a developer under s. 719.301, the developer-
2304 controlled association may not vote to waive the reserves or
2305 reduce funding of the reserves.
2306 c. For a budget adopted on or after December 31, 2024, a
2307 unit-owner-controlled association that must obtain a structural
2308 integrity reserve study may not determine to provide no reserves
2309 or reserves less adequate than required by this paragraph for
2310 items listed in paragraph (k). If a meeting of the unit owners
2311 has been called to determine to provide no reserves, or reserves
2312 less adequate than required, and such result is not attained or
2313 a quorum is not attained, the reserves as included in the budget
2314 shall go into effect.
2315 d. If the local building official as defined in s.
2316 468.603, determines that the entire cooperative building is
2317 uninhabitable due to a natural emergency as defined in s.
2318 252.34, the board may pause the contribution to its reserves or
2319 reduce reserve funding until the local building official
2320 determines that the cooperative building is habitable. Any
2321 reserve account funds held by the association may be expended,
2322 pursuant to the board's determination, to make the cooperative
2323 building and its structures habitable. Upon the determination by
2324 the local building official that the cooperative building is
2325 habitable, the association must immediately resume contributing
Page 93 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2326 funds to its reserves.
2327 3.a.(I) Reserves for the items identified in paragraph (k)
2328 (g) may be funded by regular assessments, special assessments,
2329 lines of credit, or loans. A special assessment, a line of
2330 credit, or a loan under this sub-subparagraph requires the
2331 approval of a majority vote of the total voting interests of the
2332 association.
2333 (II) A unit-owner-controlled association that is required
2334 to have a structural reserve study may secure a line of credit
2335 or a loan to fund capital expenses required by a milestone
2336 inspection under s. 553.899 or a structural integrity reserve
2337 study. The lines of credit or loans must be sufficient to fund
2338 the cumulative amount of any previously waived or unfunded
2339 portion of the reserve funding amount required by this paragraph
2340 and the most recent structural integrity reserve study. Funding
2341 from the line of credit or loans must be immediately available
2342 for access by the board to fund required repair, maintenance, or
2343 replacement expenses without further approval by the members of
2344 the association. A special assessment, a line of credit, or a
2345 loan secured under this sub-subparagraph and related details
2346 must be included in the annual financial statement required
2347 under s. 719.104(4) to be delivered to unit owners and required
2348 under s. 719.503 s. 718.503 to be provided to prospective
2349 purchasers of a unit.
2350 b. For a budget adopted on or before December 31, 2028, if
Page 94 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2351 the association has completed a milestone inspection pursuant to
2352 s. 553.899 within the previous 2 calendar years, the board, upon
2353 the approval of a majority of the total voting interests of the
2354 association, may temporarily pause, for a period of no more than
2355 two consecutive annual budgets, reserve fund contributions or
2356 reduce the amount of reserve funding for the purpose of funding
2357 repairs recommended by the milestone inspection. This sub-
2358 subparagraph does not apply to a developer-controlled
2359 association and an association in which the nondeveloper unit
2360 owners have been in control for less than 1 year. An association
2361 that has paused reserve contributions under this sub-
2362 subparagraph must have a structural integrity reserve study
2363 performed before the continuation of reserve contributions in
2364 order to determine the association's reserve funding needs and
2365 to recommend a reserve funding plan.
2366 4. Reserve funds and any interest accruing thereon shall
2367 remain in the reserve account or accounts, and shall be used
2368 only for authorized reserve expenditures unless their use for
2369 other purposes is approved in advance by a vote of the majority
2370 of the total voting interests of the association. Before
2371 turnover of control of an association by a developer to unit
2372 owners other than the developer under s. 719.301, the developer
2373 may not vote to use reserves for purposes other than that for
2374 which they were intended. For a budget adopted on or after
2375 December 31, 2024, members of a unit-owner-controlled
Page 95 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2376 association that must obtain a structural integrity reserve
2377 study may not vote to use reserve funds, or any interest
2378 accruing thereon, for purposes other than the replacement or
2379 deferred maintenance costs of the components listed in paragraph
2380 (k).
2381 5. An association's reserve accounts may be pooled for two
2382 or more required components. Reserve funding for components
2383 identified in paragraph (k) (g) may only be pooled with other
2384 components identified in paragraph (k) (g). The reserve funding
2385 indicated in the proposed annual budget must be sufficient to
2386 ensure that available funds meet or exceed projected expenses
2387 for all components in the reserve pool based on the reserve
2388 funding plan or schedule of the most recent structural integrity
2389 reserve study. A vote of the members is not required for the
2390 board to change the accounting method for reserves to a pooling
2391 accounting method or a straight-line accounting method.
2392 6. The division shall annually adjust for inflation, based
2393 on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers released in
2394 January of each year, the minimum $25,000 threshold amount for
2395 required reserves. By February 1, 2026, and annually thereafter,
2396 the division must conspicuously post on its website the
2397 inflation-adjusted minimum threshold amount for required
2398 reserves.
2399 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct cross-references to conform
2400 to context. Paragraph (g) relates to common expenses;
Page 96 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2401 paragraph (k) requires structural integrity reserve
2402 studies. Section 718.503 relates to disclosure prior to
2403 sale of residential condominiums; s. 719.503 relates to
2404 disclosure prior to sale of residential cooperatives.
2405 Section 47. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
2406 720.303, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2407 720.303 Association powers and duties; meetings of board;
2408 official records; budgets; financial reporting; association
2409 funds; recalls.—
2410 (4) OFFICIAL RECORDS.—
2411 (b)1. By January 1, 2025, an association that has 100 or
2412 more parcels shall post the following documents on its website
2413 or make available such documents through an application that can
2414 be downloaded on a mobile device:
2415 a. The articles of incorporation of the association and
2416 each amendment thereto.
2417 b. The recorded bylaws of the association and each
2418 amendment thereto.
2419 c. The declaration of covenants and a copy of each
2420 amendment thereto.
2421 d. The current rules of the association.
2422 e. A list of all current executory contracts or documents
2423 to which the association is a party or under which the
2424 association or the parcel owners have an obligation or
2425 responsibility and, after bidding for the related materials,
Page 97 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2426 equipment, or services has closed, a list of bids received by
2427 the association within the past year.
2428 f. The annual budget required by subsection (6) and any
2429 proposed budget to be considered at the annual meeting.
2430 g. The financial report required by subsection (7) and any
2431 monthly income or expense statement to be considered at a
2432 meeting.
2433 h. The association's current insurance policies.
2434 i. The certification of each director as required by s.
2435 720.3033(1)(a).
2436 j. All contracts or transactions between the association
2437 and any director, officer, corporation, firm, or association
2438 that is not an affiliated homeowners' association or any other
2439 entity in which a director of an association is also a director
2440 or an officer and has a financial interest.
2441 k. Any contract or document regarding a conflict of
2442 interest or possible conflict of interest as provided in ss.
2443 468.436(2)(b)6. and 720.3033(2).
2444 l. Notice of any scheduled meeting of members and the
2445 agenda for the meeting, as required by s. 720.306, at least 14
2446 days before such meeting. The notice must be posted in plain
2447 view on the homepage of the website or application, or on a
2448 separate subpage of the website or application labeled "Notices"
2449 which is conspicuously visible and linked from the homepage. The
2450 association shall also post on its website or application any
Page 98 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2451 document to be considered and voted on by the members during the
2452 meeting or any document listed on the meeting agenda at least 7
2453 days before the meeting at which such document or information
2454 within the document will be considered.
2455 m. Notice of any board meeting, the agenda, and any other
2456 document required for such meeting as required by subsection (2)
2457 (3), which must be posted on the website or application no later
2458 than the date required for notice under subsection (2) (3).
2459 2. The association's website or application must be
2460 accessible through the Internet and must contain a subpage, web
2461 portal, or other protected electronic location that is
2462 inaccessible to the general public and accessible only to parcel
2463 owners and employees of the association.
2464 3. Upon written request by a parcel owner, the association
2465 must provide the parcel owner with a username and password and
2466 access to the protected sections of the association's website or
2467 application which contains the official documents of the
2468 association.
2469 4. The association shall ensure that the information and
2470 records described in paragraph (5)(g), which are not allowed to
2471 be accessible to parcel owners, are not posted on the
2472 association's website or application. If protected information
2473 or information restricted from being accessible to parcel owners
2474 is included in documents that are required to be posted on the
2475 association's website or application, the association must
Page 99 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2476 ensure the information is redacted before posting the documents.
2477 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the association or its authorized
2478 agent is not liable for disclosing information that is protected
2479 or restricted under paragraph (5)(g) unless such disclosure was
2480 made with a knowing or intentional disregard of the protected or
2481 restricted nature of such information.
2482 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct a cross-reference to conform
2483 to the fact that notice requirements are referenced in
2484 subsection (2). Subsection (3) relates to minutes of
2485 meetings.
2486 Section 48. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
2487 782.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2488 782.071 Vehicular homicide.—"Vehicular homicide" is the
2489 killing of a human being, or the killing of an unborn child by
2490 any injury to the mother, caused by the operation of a motor
2491 vehicle by another in a reckless manner likely to cause the
2492 death of, or great bodily harm to, another.
2493 (1) Vehicular homicide is:
2494 (c) A felony of the first degree, punishable as provided
2495 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if the person has a
2496 prior conviction under this section, s. 316.193(3)(c)3., s.
2497 327.35(3)(a)3.c. s. 327.35(3)(c)3., or s. 782.072.
2498 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
2499 conform to the redesignation of subunits in s. 327.35(3) by
2500 s. 6, ch. 2025-197, Laws of Florida.
Page 100 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2501 Section 49. Subsection (3) of section 782.072, Florida
2502 Statutes, is amended to read:
2503 782.072 Vessel homicide.—
2504 (3) A felony of the first degree, punishable as provided
2505 in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if the person has a
2506 prior conviction under this section, s. 316.193(3)(c)3., s.
2507 327.35(3)(a)3.c. s. 327.35(3)(c)3., or s. 782.071.
2508 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
2509 conform to the redesignation of subunits in s. 327.35(3) by
2510 s. 6, ch. 2025-197, Laws of Florida.
2511 Section 50. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of
2512 section 790.052, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2513 790.052 Carrying of concealed firearms by; off-duty law
2514 enforcement officers, correctional officers, and correctional
2515 probation officers.—
2516 (1)
2517 (b) All persons holding an active certification from the
2518 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commission as a law
2519 enforcement officers officer, a correctional officers officer,
2520 or a correctional probation officers officer as defined in s.
2521 943.10(1), (2), (3), (6), (7), (8), or (9) meet the definition
2522 of "qualified law enforcement officer" in 18 U.S.C. s. 926B(c).
2523 (c) All persons who held an active certification from the
2524 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commission as a law
2525 enforcement officers officer, correctional officers officer, or
Page 101 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2526 correctional probation officers officer as defined in s.
2527 943.10(1), (2), (3), (6), (7), (8), or (9), while working for an
2528 employing agency, as defined in s. 943.10(4), but have separated
2529 from service under the conditions set forth in 18 U.S.C. s.
2530 926C(c), meet the definition of "qualified retired law
2531 enforcement officer."
2532 Reviser's note.—Amended to provide contextual consistency and
2533 conform to context.
2534 Section 51. Paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of section
2535 823.11, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2536 823.11 Derelict and migrant vessels; relocation or
2537 removal; penalty.—
2538 (4)
2539 (c) The commission may establish a program to provide
2540 grants to local governments for the removal, storage,
2541 destruction, and disposal of derelict vessels or migrant vessels
2542 from the waters of this state. This grant funding may also be
2543 used for the removal, storage, destruction, and disposal of
2544 vessels declared a public nuisance pursuant to s. 327.73(1)(aa)
2545 or the derelict vessel prevention program established pursuant
2546 to s. 327.4107(6) s. 327.4107(7). The program must be funded
2547 from the Marine Resources Conservation Trust Fund or the Florida
2548 Coastal Protection Trust Fund. Notwithstanding s. 216.181(11),
2549 funds available for these grants may only be authorized by
2550 appropriations acts of the Legislature. In a given fiscal year,
Page 102 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2551 if all funds appropriated pursuant to this paragraph are not
2552 requested by and granted to local governments for the removal,
2553 storage, destruction, and disposal of derelict vessels, migrant
2554 vessels, or vessels declared a public nuisance pursuant to s.
2555 327.73(1)(aa) by the end of the third quarter, the Fish and
2556 Wildlife Conservation Commission may use the remainder of the
2557 funds to remove, store, destroy, and dispose of, or to pay
2558 private contractors to remove, store, destroy, and dispose of,
2559 derelict vessels, migrant vessels, or vessels declared a public
2560 nuisance pursuant to s. 327.73(1)(aa). The commission shall
2561 adopt by rule procedures for local governments to submit a grant
2562 application and criteria for allocating available funds. Such
2563 criteria must include, at a minimum, all of the following:
2564 1. The number of derelict vessels and migrant vessels
2565 within the jurisdiction of the applicant.
2566 2. The threat posed by such vessels to public health or
2567 safety, the environment, navigation, or the aesthetic condition
2568 of the general vicinity.
2569 3. The degree of commitment of the local government to
2570 maintain waters free of abandoned, derelict, and migrant vessels
2571 and to seek legal action against those who abandon vessels in
2572 the waters of this state as defined in s. 327.02.
2573 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct a cross-reference to conform
2574 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 327.4107 by s. 2,
2575 ch. 2025-147, Laws of Florida.
Page 103 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2576 Section 52. Paragraph (f) of subsection (8) of section
2577 836.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2578 836.13 Altered sexual depictions; prohibited acts;
2579 penalties; applicability.—
2580 (8)
2581 (f) In addition to the remedies under subsection (7) (5),
2582 a failure to reasonably comply with the notice and removal
2583 obligations under this subsection shall be treated as an unfair
2584 or a deceptive act or practice under part II of chapter 501, and
2585 the person or entity responsible shall be subject to the
2586 penalties and remedies provided in part II of chapter 501.
2587 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
2588 conform to the redesignation of subunits by s. 3, ch. 2025-
2589 99, Laws of Florida.
2590 Section 53. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
2591 893.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2592 893.03 Standards and schedules.—The substances enumerated
2593 in this section are controlled by this chapter. The controlled
2594 substances listed or to be listed in Schedules I, II, III, IV,
2595 and V are included by whatever official, common, usual,
2596 chemical, trade name, or class designated. The provisions of
2597 this section shall not be construed to include within any of the
2598 schedules contained in this section any excluded drugs listed
2599 within the purview of 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.22, styled "Excluded
2600 Substances"; 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.24, styled "Exempt Chemical
Page 104 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2601 Preparations"; 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.32, styled "Exempted
2602 Prescription Products"; or 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.34, styled "Exempt
2603 Anabolic Steroid Products."
2604 (4) SCHEDULE IV.—
2605 (b) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
2606 another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or
2607 preparation which contains any quantity of the following
2608 substances, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
2609 whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of
2610 isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation,
2611 are controlled in Schedule IV:
2612 1. Alfaxalone.
2613 2. Alprazolam.
2614 3. Barbital.
2615 4. Bromazepam.
2616 5. Butorphanol tartrate.
2617 6. Camazepam.
2618 7. Carisoprodol.
2619 8. Cathine.
2620 9. Chloral betaine.
2621 10. Chloral hydrate.
2622 11. Chlordiazepoxide.
2623 12. Clobazam.
2624 13. Clonazepam.
2625 14. Clorazepate.
Page 105 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2626 15. Clotiazepam.
2627 16. Cloxazolam.
2628 17. Dexfenfluramine.
2629 18. Delorazepam.
2630 19. Dichloralphenazone.
2631 20. Diazepam.
2632 21. Diethylpropion.
2633 22. Eluxadoline.
2634 23. Estazolam.
2635 24. Eszopiclone.
2636 25. Ethchlorvynol.
2637 26. Ethinamate.
2638 27. Ethyl loflazepate.
2639 28. Fencamfamin.
2640 29. Fenfluramine.
2641 30. Fenproporex.
2642 30.31. Fludiazepam.
2643 31.32. Flurazepam.
2644 32.33. Fospropofol.
2645 33.34. Halazepam.
2646 34.35. Haloxazolam.
2647 35.36. Ketazolam.
2648 36.37. Loprazolam.
2649 37.38. Lorazepam.
2650 38.39. Lorcaserin.
Page 106 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2651 39.40. Lormetazepam.
2652 40.41. Mazindol.
2653 41.42. Mebutamate.
2654 42.43. Medazepam.
2655 43.44. Mefenorex.
2656 44.45. Meprobamate.
2657 45.46. Methohexital.
2658 46.47. Methylphenobarbital.
2659 47.48. Midazolam.
2660 48.49. Modafinil.
2661 49.50. Nimetazepam.
2662 50.51. Nitrazepam.
2663 51.52. Nordiazepam.
2664 52.53. Oxazepam.
2665 53.54. Oxazolam.
2666 54.55. Paraldehyde.
2667 55.56. Pemoline.
2668 56.57. Pentazocine.
2669 57.58. Petrichloral.
2670 58.59. Phenobarbital.
2671 59.60. Phentermine.
2672 60.61. Pinazepam.
2673 61.62. Pipradrol.
2674 62.63. Prazepam.
2675 63.64. Propoxyphene (dosage forms).
Page 107 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2676 64.65. Propylhexedrine, excluding any patent or
2677 proprietary preparation containing propylhexedrine, unless
2678 otherwise provided by federal law.
2679 65.66. Quazepam.
2680 66.67. Sibutramine.
2681 67.68. SPA[(-)-1 dimethylamino-1, 2 diphenylethane].
2682 68.69. Suvorexant.
2683 69.70. Temazepam.
2684 70.71. Tetrazepam.
2685 71.72. Tramadol.
2686 72.73. Triazolam.
2687 73.74. Zaleplon.
2688 74.75. Zolpidem.
2689 75.76. Zopiclone.
2690 76.77. Not more than 1 milligram of difenoxin and not less
2691 than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit.
2692 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to s. 5, ch. 97-1, Laws of
2693 Florida, which repealed paragraph (4)(w), redesignated as
2694 subparagraph (4)(b)29. by s. 8, ch. 2018-3, Laws of
2695 Florida, effective upon the removal of fenfluramine from
2696 the schedules of controlled substances in 21 C.F.R. s.
2697 1308. The Drug Enforcement Administration, United States
2698 Department of Justice, in FR Doc. 2022-27400, filed
2699 December 22, 2022, issued a final rule removing
2700 fenfluramine from the schedules of the Controlled
Page 108 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2701 Substances Act, effective December 23, 2022.
2702 Section 54. Subsection (1) of section 914.27, Florida
2703 Statutes, is amended to read:
2704 914.27 Confidentiality of victim and witness information.—
2705 (1) Information held by any state or local law enforcement
2706 agency, any state attorney, the statewide prosecutor, or the
2707 Department of Law Enforcement which discloses:
2708 (a) The identity or location of a victim or witness who
2709 has been identified or certified for protective or relocation
2710 services pursuant to s. 914.25;
2711 (b) The identity or location of an immediate family member
2712 of a victim or witness who has been identified or certified
2713 pursuant to s. 914.25;
2714 (c) Relocation sites, techniques, or procedures utilized
2715 or developed as a result of the victim and witness protective
2716 services afforded by s. 914.25; or
2717 (d) The identity or relocation site of any victim,
2718 witness, or immediate family member of a victim or witness who
2719 has made a relocation of permanent residence by reason of the
2720 victim's or witness's involvement in the investigation or
2721 prosecution giving rise to certification for protective or
2722 relocation services pursuant to s. 914.25;
2723
2724 is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art.
2725 I of the State Constitution. Such information may be shared by
Page 109 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2726 law enforcement agencies, state attorneys, and the statewide
2727 prosecutor to facilitate the protective or relocation services
2728 provided pursuant to s. 914.25 and to support the prosecution
2729 efforts of the state attorneys and the statewide prosecutor. Any
2730 information so shared must remain confidential and exempt in the
2731 hands of any agency or entity to which the information is
2732 provided.
2733 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial insertion to
2734 improve clarity.
2735 Section 55. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
2736 916.111, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2737 916.111 Training of mental health experts.—The evaluation
2738 of defendants for competency to proceed or for sanity at the
2739 time of the commission of the offense shall be conducted in such
2740 a way as to ensure uniform application of the criteria
2741 enumerated in Rules 3.210 and 3.216, Florida Rules of Criminal
2742 Procedure. The department shall develop, and may contract with
2743 accredited institutions:
2744 (1) To provide:
2745 (c) Training for mental health professionals in the
2746 application of these protocols and procedures in performing
2747 forensic evaluations and providing reports to the courts.
2748 Training must include, but is not limited to, information on
2749 statutes and rules related to competency restoration, evidence-
2750 based practices, and least restrictive treatment alternatives
Page 110 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2751 and placement options as described in s. 916.12(4)(c); and
2752 Reviser's note.—Amended to improve clarity and facilitate
2753 correct interpretation. Section 916.12(4)(c) references
2754 both treatment alternatives and placement options.
2755 Section 56. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
2756 916.115, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2757 916.115 Appointment of experts.—
2758 (1) The court shall appoint no more than three experts to
2759 determine the mental condition of a defendant in a criminal
2760 case, including competency to proceed, insanity, involuntary
2761 placement, and treatment. The experts may evaluate the defendant
2762 in jail or in another appropriate local facility or in a
2763 facility of the Department of Corrections.
2764 (a) Each The court-appointed expert experts shall:
2765 1. Be a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or physician.
2766 2. Have completed initial and annual forensic evaluator
2767 training, provided by the department.
2768 3. If performing juvenile evaluations, have completed
2769 initial and annual juvenile forensic competency evaluation
2770 training provided by the department.
2771 Reviser's note.—Amended to improve sentence structure.
2772 Section 57. Paragraph (i) of subsection (3) of section
2773 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2774 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
2775 ranking chart.—
Page 111 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2776 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
2777 (i) LEVEL 9
2778
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
2779
316.193 1st DUI manslaughter; failing to
(3)(c)3.b. render aid or give
information.
2780
316.193 1st DUI manslaughter; prior
(3)(c)3.c. conviction for DUI
manslaughter, BUI
manslaughter, vehicular
homicide, or vessel homicide.
2781
327.35 1st BUI manslaughter; failing
(3)(a)3.c.(II) to render aid or give
information.
2782
327.35 1st BUI manslaughter; prior
(3)(a)3.c.(III) conviction for DUI
327.35(3)(c)3.c. manslaughter, BUI
manslaughter, vehicular
homicide, or vessel
Page 112 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
homicide.
2783
409.920 1st Medicaid provider
(2)(b)1.c. fraud; $50,000 or more.
2784
499.0051(8) 1st Knowing sale or purchase of
contraband prescription
drugs resulting in great
bodily harm.
2785
560.123(8)(b)3. 1st Failure to report
currency or payment
instruments totaling or
exceeding $100,000 by
money transmitter.
2786
560.125(5)(c) 1st Money transmitter business
by unauthorized person,
currency, or payment
instruments totaling or
exceeding $100,000.
2787
655.50(10)(b)3. 1st Failure to report
financial transactions
totaling or exceeding
Page 113 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
$100,000 by financial
institution.
2788
775.0844 1st Aggravated white collar
crime.
2789
782.04(1) 1st Attempt, conspire, or solicit
to commit premeditated
murder.
2790
782.04(3) 1st,PBL Accomplice to murder in
connection with arson,
sexual battery,
robbery, burglary,
aggravated fleeing or
eluding with serious
bodily injury or death,
and other specified
felonies.
2791
782.051(1) 1st Attempted felony murder
while perpetrating or
attempting to perpetrate a
felony enumerated in s.
782.04(3).
Page 114 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2792
782.07(2) 1st Aggravated manslaughter of an
elderly person or disabled
adult.
2793
787.01(1)(a)1. 1st,PBL Kidnapping; hold for
ransom or reward or
as a shield or
hostage.
2794
787.01(1)(a)2. 1st,PBL Kidnapping with
intent to commit or
facilitate
commission of any
felony.
2795
787.01(1)(a)4. 1st,PBL Kidnapping with intent
to interfere with
performance of any
governmental or
political function.
2796
787.02(3)(a) 1st,PBL False imprisonment;
child under age 13;
perpetrator also commits
Page 115 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
aggravated child abuse,
sexual battery, or lewd
or lascivious battery,
molestation, conduct, or
exhibition.
2797
787.06(3)(c)1. 1st Human trafficking for
labor and services of an
unauthorized alien child.
2798
787.06(3)(d) 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for commercial
sexual activity of an
unauthorized adult alien.
2799
787.06(3)(f)1. 1st,PBL Human trafficking for
commercial sexual
activity by the
transfer or transport
of any child from
outside Florida to
within the state.
2800
790.161 1st Attempted capital destructive
device offense.
Page 116 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2801
790.166(2) 1st,PBL Possessing, selling,
using, or attempting to
use a weapon of mass
destruction.
2802
794.011(2) 1st Attempted sexual
battery; victim less
than 12 years of age.
2803
794.011(2) Life Sexual battery;
offender younger than
18 years and commits
sexual battery on a
person less than 12
years.
2804
794.011(4)(a) 1st,PBL Sexual battery, certain
circumstances; victim 12
years of age or older but
younger than 18 years;
offender 18 years or
older.
2805
794.011(4)(b) 1st Sexual battery, certain
Page 117 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
circumstances; victim and
offender 18 years of age or
older.
2806
794.011(4)(c) 1st Sexual battery, certain
circumstances; victim 12
years of age or older;
offender younger than 18
years.
2807
794.011(4)(d) 1st,PBL Sexual battery, certain
circumstances; victim 12
years of age or older;
prior conviction for
specified sex offenses.
2808
794.011(8)(b) 1st,PBL Sexual battery;
engage in sexual
conduct with minor
12 to 18 years by
person in familial
or custodial
authority.
2809
794.08(2) 1st Female genital mutilation;
Page 118 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
victim younger than 18 years
of age.
2810
800.04(5)(b) Life Lewd or lascivious
molestation; victim less
than 12 years; offender 18
years or older.
2811
812.13(2)(a) 1st,PBL Robbery with
firearm or other
deadly weapon.
2812
812.133(2)(a) 1st,PBL Carjacking; firearm
or other deadly
weapon.
2813
812.135(2)(b) 1st Home-invasion
robbery with weapon.
2814
817.535(3)(b) 1st Filing false lien or other
unauthorized document;
second or subsequent
offense; property owner is
a public officer or
employee.
Page 119 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2815
817.535(4)(a)2. 1st Filing false claim or
other unauthorized
document; defendant is
incarcerated or under
supervision.
2816
817.535(5)(b) 1st Filing false lien or other
unauthorized document;
second or subsequent
offense; owner of the
property incurs financial
loss as a result of the
false instrument.
2817
817.568(7) 2nd, Fraudulent use of personal
PBL identification information of
an individual under the age of
18 by his or her parent, legal
guardian, or person exercising
custodial authority.
2818
827.03(2)(a) 1st Aggravated child abuse.
2819
847.0145(1) 1st Selling, or otherwise
Page 120 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
transferring custody or
control, of a minor.
2820
847.0145(2) 1st Purchasing, or otherwise
obtaining custody or
control, of a minor.
2821
859.01 1st Poisoning or introducing
bacteria, radioactive materials,
viruses, or chemical compounds
into food, drink, medicine, or
water with intent to kill or
injure another person.
2822
893.135 1st Attempted capital trafficking
offense.
2823
893.135(1)(a)3. 1st Trafficking in
cannabis, more than
10,000 lbs.
2824
893.135 1st Trafficking in cocaine,
(1)(b)1.c. more than 400 grams, less
than 150 kilograms.
2825
Page 121 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
893.135 1st Trafficking in illegal
(1)(c)1.c. drugs, more than 28 grams,
less than 30 kilograms.
2826
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone,
(1)(c)2.d. 300 grams or more, less than
30 kilograms.
2827
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone,
(1)(c)3.d. 100 grams or more, less
than 30 kilograms.
2828
893.135 1st Trafficking in
(1)(c)4.b.(III) fentanyl, 28 grams or
more.
2829
893.135 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine,
(1)(d)1.c. 400 grams or more.
2830
893.135 1st Trafficking in methaqualone,
(1)(e)1.c. 25 kilograms or more.
2831
893.135 1st Trafficking in amphetamine,
(1)(f)1.c. 200 grams or more.
2832
Page 122 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
893.135 1st Trafficking in gamma-
(1)(h)1.c. hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 10
kilograms or more.
2833
893.135 1st Trafficking in 1,4-
(1)(j)1.c. Butanediol, 10 kilograms or
more.
2834
893.135 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines,
(1)(k)2.c. 400 grams or more.
2835
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.d. cannabinoids, 30 kilograms or
more.
2836
893.135 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl
(1)(n)2.c. phenethylamines, 200 grams or
more.
2837
896.101(5)(c) 1st Money laundering,
financial instruments
totaling or exceeding
$100,000.
2838
896.104(4)(a)3. 1st Structuring transactions
Page 123 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
to evade reporting or
registration
requirements, financial
transactions totaling or
exceeding $100,000.
2839
2840 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
2841 conform to the redesignation of subunits in s. 327.35(3) by
2842 s. 6, ch. 2025-197, Laws of Florida.
2843 Section 58. Subsection (6) of section 934.255, Florida
2844 Statutes, is amended to read:
2845 934.255 Subpoenas in investigations of sexual offenses.—
2846 (6) An investigative or law enforcement officer who
2847 obtains a subpoena pursuant to paragraph (2)(c) may delay the
2848 notification required under that paragraph for a period not to
2849 exceed 180 days upon the execution of a written certification of
2850 a supervisory official that there is reason to believe that that
2851 notification of the existence of the subpoena may have an
2852 adverse result described in subsection (7).
2853 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial deletion to
2854 remove duplicative language.
2855 Section 59. Paragraph (c) of subsection (7) of section
2856 945.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2857 945.42 Definitions; ss. 945.40-945.49.—As used in ss.
2858 945.40-945.49, the following terms shall have the meanings
Page 124 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2859 ascribed to them, unless the context shall clearly indicate
2860 otherwise:
2861 (7) "In need of care and treatment" means that an inmate
2862 has a mental illness for which inpatient services in a mental
2863 health treatment facility are necessary and because of the
2864 mental illness:
2865 (c) The inmate is unable to determine for himself or
2866 herself whether placement is necessary.; and
2867 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to punctuation elsewhere in
2868 the subsection. As amended by s. 9, ch. 2025-81, Laws of
2869 Florida, paragraphs (7)(a), (b), and (d) end in periods.
2870 Section 60. Subsection (2) and paragraph (a) of subsection
2871 (3) of section 945.485, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2872 945.485 Management and treatment for self-injurious
2873 behaviors.—
2874 (2) In accordance with s. 945.6402 s. 945.6042, the
2875 Legislature finds that an inmate retains the fundamental right
2876 of self-determination regarding decisions pertaining to his or
2877 her own health, including the right to choose or refuse medical
2878 treatment or life-saving medical procedures. However, the
2879 inmate's right to privacy and decisionmaking regarding medical
2880 treatment may be outweighed by compelling state interests.
2881 (3) When an inmate is engaging in active or ongoing self-
2882 injurious behavior and has refused to provide express and
2883 informed consent for treatment related to the self-injurious
Page 125 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2884 behavior, the warden of the facility where the inmate is housed
2885 shall consult with the inmate's treating physician regarding the
2886 inmate's medical and mental health status, current medical and
2887 mental health treatment needs, and competency to provide express
2888 and informed consent for treatment. The warden shall also
2889 determine whether the inmate's self-injurious behavior presents
2890 a danger to the safety of department staff or other inmates or
2891 the security, internal order, or discipline of the institution.
2892 (a) If the inmate's treating physician determines that the
2893 inmate has a mental illness and is incompetent to consent to
2894 treatment, the physician shall proceed in accordance with s.
2895 945.6402 s. 945.6042 for any necessary surgical or medical
2896 services. If the inmate is in need of care and treatment as
2897 defined in s. 945.42, the inmate shall be referred to a mental
2898 health treatment facility for an involuntary examination in
2899 accordance with s. 945.44.
2900 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct a transposition error.
2901 Section 945.6402 relates to inmate health care advance
2902 directives. Section 945.6042 does not exist.
2903 Section 61. Subsection (2) of section 951.27, Florida
2904 Statutes, is amended to read:
2905 951.27 Blood tests of inmates.—
2906 (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
2907 serologic blood test results obtained pursuant to subsection (1)
2908 are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art.
Page 126 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2909 I of the State Constitution. However, it is not unlawful for the
2910 person receiving the test results to divulge the test results to
2911 the sheriff or chief correctional officer. Such test results
2912 must also be provided to employees or officers of the sheriff or
2913 chief correctional officer who are responsible for the custody
2914 and care of the affected inmate and have a need to know such
2915 information, to any person who provided a notice of exposure
2916 under subsection (4), and as provided in ss. 775.0877 and
2917 960.003. In addition, upon request of the victim or the victim's
2918 legal guardian, or the parent or legal guardian of the victim if
2919 the victim is a minor, the results of any HIV test performed on
2920 an inmate arrested for any sexual offense involving oral, anal,
2921 or female genital penetration by, or union with, the sexual
2922 organ of another, must be disclosed to the victim or the
2923 victim's legal guardian, or to the parent or legal guardian of
2924 the victim if the victim is a minor. In such cases, the county
2925 or municipal detention facility shall furnish the test results
2926 to the Department of Health, which is responsible for disclosing
2927 the results to public health agencies as provided in s. 775.0877
2928 and to the victim or the victim's legal guardian, or the parent
2929 or legal guardian of the victim if the victim is a minor, as
2930 provided in s. 960.003(3). As used in this subsection, the term
2931 "female genitals" includes the labia minora, labia majora,
2932 clitoris, vulva, hymen, and vagina.
2933 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial insertion to
Page 127 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2934 improve clarity.
2935 Section 62. Subsection (14) of section 984.151, Florida
2936 Statutes, is amended to read:
2937 984.151 Early truancy intervention; truancy petition;
2938 judgment.—
2939 (14) Any truant student who that meets the definition of a
2940 child in need of services and who has been found in contempt for
2941 violation of a court order under s. 984.09 two or more times
2942 shall be referred to the case staffing committee under s. 984.12
2943 with a recommendation to file a petition for a child in need of
2944 services.
2945 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial substitution to
2946 conform to context.
2947 Section 63. Subsection (2) of section 984.19, Florida
2948 Statutes, is amended to read:
2949 984.19 Medical screening and treatment of child;
2950 examination of parent, legal guardian, or person requesting
2951 custody.—
2952 (2) When the medical screening authorized by subsection
2953 (1) is performed or when it is otherwise determined by a
2954 licensed health care professional that a child is in need of
2955 medical treatment, consent for medical treatment shall be
2956 obtained in the following manner:
2957 (a)1. Consent to medical treatment shall be obtained from
2958 a parent, legal guardian, or custodian of the child; or
Page 128 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2959 2. A court order for such treatment shall be obtained.
2960 (b) If a parent, legal guardian, or custodian of the child
2961 is unavailable and his or her whereabouts cannot be reasonably
2962 ascertained, and it is after normal working hours so that a
2963 court order cannot reasonably be obtained, an authorized agent
2964 of the department or its provider has the authority to consent
2965 to necessary medical treatment for the child. The authority of
2966 the department to consent to medical treatment in this
2967 circumstance is limited to the time reasonably necessary to
2968 obtain court authorization.
2969 (c) If a parent, legal guardian, or custodian of the child
2970 is available but refuses to consent to the necessary treatment,
2971 a court order is required, unless the situation meets the
2972 definition of an emergency in s. 743.064 or the treatment needed
2973 is related to suspected abuse or neglect of the child by the
2974 parent or guardian. In such case, the department's authorized
2975 agent may consent to necessary medical treatment. This authority
2976 is limited to the time reasonably necessary to obtain court
2977 authorization.
2978
2979 In no case may the department consent to sterilization,
2980 abortion, or termination of life support.
2981 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial insertion to
2982 improve clarity.
2983 Section 64. Subsection (1) of section 984.21, Florida
Page 129 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
2984 Statutes, is amended to read:
2985 984.21 Orders of adjudication.—
2986 (1) An order of adjudication by a court that a child is a
2987 child in need of services is a civil adjudication, and is not be
2988 deemed a conviction, nor shall the child be deemed to have been
2989 found guilty or to be a delinquent or criminal by reason of
2990 adjudication, nor shall that adjudication operate to impose upon
2991 the child any of the civil disabilities ordinarily imposed by or
2992 resulting from conviction or disqualify or prejudice the child
2993 in any civil service application or appointment.
2994 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm an editorial deletion to
2995 improve clarity.
2996 Section 65. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
2997 1003.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2998 1003.27 Court procedure and penalties.—The court procedure
2999 and penalties for the enforcement of the provisions of this
3000 part, relating to compulsory school attendance, shall be as
3001 follows:
3002 (2) NONENROLLMENT AND NONATTENDANCE CASES.—
3003 (c) The district school superintendent must provide the
3004 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles the legal name,
3005 sex, date of birth, and social security number of each minor
3006 student who has been reported under this paragraph and who fails
3007 to otherwise satisfy the requirements of s. 322.091. The
3008 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles may not issue a
Page 130 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
3009 driver license or learner's driver license to, and shall suspend
3010 any previously issued driver license or learner's driver license
3011 of, any such minor student, pursuant to s. 322.091.
3012 Reviser's note.—Amended to confirm the editorial reinsertion of
3013 the word "to" as stricken by s. 32, ch. 2025-153, Laws of
3014 Florida, to improve clarity.
3015 Section 66. Paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section
3016 1008.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
3017 1008.25 Public school student progression; student
3018 support; coordinated screening and progress monitoring;
3019 reporting requirements.—
3020 (6) MATHEMATICS DEFICIENCY AND PARENTAL NOTIFICATION.—
3021 (b) A Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program student
3022 who exhibits a substantial deficiency in early math skills based
3023 upon the results of the administration of the midyear or final
3024 coordinated screening and progress monitoring under subsection
3025 (9) (8) shall be referred to the local school district and may
3026 be eligible to receive intensive mathematics interventions
3027 before participating in kindergarten.
3028 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct a cross-reference to conform
3029 to context. Subsection (8) relates to successful
3030 progression for retained third grade students; subsection
3031 (9) relates to a coordinated screening and progress
3032 monitoring system.
3033 Section 67. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
Page 131 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
3034 1011.61, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
3035 1011.61 Definitions.—Notwithstanding the provisions of s.
3036 1000.21, the following terms are defined as follows for the
3037 purposes of the Florida Education Finance Program:
3038 (1) A "full-time equivalent student" in each program of
3039 the district is defined in terms of full-time students and part-
3040 time students as follows:
3041 (c)1. A "full-time equivalent student" is:
3042 a. A full-time student in any one of the programs listed
3043 in s. 1011.62(1)(c); or
3044 b. A combination of full-time or part-time students in any
3045 one of the programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c) which is the
3046 equivalent of one full-time student based on the following
3047 calculations:
3048 (I) A full-time student in a combination of programs
3049 listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c) shall be a fraction of a full-time
3050 equivalent membership in each special program equal to the
3051 number of net hours per school year for which he or she is a
3052 member, divided by the appropriate number of hours set forth in
3053 subparagraph (a)1. The difference between that fraction or sum
3054 of fractions and the maximum value as set forth in subsection
3055 (3) (4) for each full-time student is presumed to be the balance
3056 of the student's time not spent in a special program and shall
3057 be recorded as time in the appropriate basic program.
3058 (II) A prekindergarten student with a disability shall
Page 132 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
3059 meet the requirements specified for kindergarten students.
3060 (III) A full-time equivalent student for students in
3061 kindergarten through grade 12 in a full-time virtual instruction
3062 program under s. 1002.45 or a virtual charter school under s.
3063 1002.33 shall consist of six full-credit completions or the
3064 prescribed level of content that counts toward promotion to the
3065 next grade in programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c). Credit
3066 completions may be a combination of full-credit courses or half-
3067 credit courses.
3068 (IV) A full-time equivalent student for students in
3069 kindergarten through grade 12 in a part-time virtual instruction
3070 program under s. 1002.45 shall consist of six full-credit
3071 completions in programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c)1. and 3.
3072 Credit completions may be a combination of full-credit courses
3073 or half-credit courses.
3074 (V) A Florida Virtual School full-time equivalent student
3075 shall consist of six full-credit completions or the prescribed
3076 level of content that counts toward promotion to the next grade
3077 in the programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c)1. and 3. for students
3078 participating in kindergarten through grade 12 part-time virtual
3079 instruction and the programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c) for
3080 students participating in kindergarten through grade 12 full-
3081 time virtual instruction. Credit completions may be a
3082 combination of full-credit courses or half-credit courses.
3083 (VI) Each successfully completed full-credit course earned
Page 133 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
3084 through an online course delivered by a district other than the
3085 one in which the student resides shall be calculated as 1/6 FTE.
3086 (VII) A full-time equivalent student for courses requiring
3087 passage of a statewide, standardized end-of-course assessment
3088 under s. 1003.4282 to earn a standard high school diploma shall
3089 be defined and reported based on the number of instructional
3090 hours as provided in this subsection.
3091 (VIII) For students enrolled in a school district as a
3092 full-time student, the district may report 1/6 FTE for each
3093 student who passes a statewide, standardized end-of-course
3094 assessment without being enrolled in the corresponding course.
3095 2. A student in membership in a program scheduled for more
3096 or less than 180 school days or the equivalent on an hourly
3097 basis as specified by rules of the State Board of Education is a
3098 fraction of a full-time equivalent membership equal to the
3099 number of instructional hours in membership divided by the
3100 appropriate number of hours set forth in subparagraph (a)1.;
3101 however, for the purposes of this subparagraph, membership in
3102 programs scheduled for more than 180 days is limited to students
3103 enrolled in:
3104 a. Juvenile justice education programs.
3105 b. The Florida Virtual School.
3106 c. Virtual instruction programs and virtual charter
3107 schools for the purpose of course completion and credit recovery
3108 pursuant to ss. 1002.45 and 1003.498. Course completion applies
Page 134 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
3109 only to a student who is reported during the second or third
3110 membership surveys and who does not complete a virtual education
3111 course by the end of the regular school year. The course must be
3112 completed no later than the deadline for amending the final
3113 student enrollment survey for that year. Credit recovery applies
3114 only to a student who has unsuccessfully completed a traditional
3115 or virtual education course during the regular school year and
3116 must retake the course in order to be eligible to graduate with
3117 the student's class.
3118
3119 The full-time equivalent student enrollment calculated under
3120 this subsection is subject to the requirements in subsection
3121 (3).
3122
3123 The department shall determine and implement an equitable method
3124 of equivalent funding for schools operating under emergency
3125 conditions, which schools have been approved by the department
3126 to operate for less than the minimum term as provided in s.
3127 1011.60(2).
3128 Reviser's note.—Amended to correct a cross-reference to conform
3129 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 1011.61 by s. 16,
3130 ch. 2025-203, Laws of Florida.
3131 Section 68. Paragraph (f) of subsection (2) of section
3132 1012.552, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
3133 1012.552 The Coaching for Educator Readiness and Teaching
Page 135 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7027 2026
3134 (CERT) Certification Program.—
3135 (2) PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS.—A CERT program must include all
3136 of the following:
3137 (f) Provide Guidance and on-the-job training in the
3138 classroom on mastering Florida Educator Accomplished Practices.
3139 Reviser's note.—Amended to conform to context and improve
3140 clarity.
3141 Section 69. This act shall take effect on the 60th day
3142 after adjournment sine die of the session of the Legislature in
3143 which enacted.
Page 136 of 136
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7027-00